   #alternate alternate alternate

   Skip to main content

   (BUTTON)

Quick Links

     * (BUTTON) Careers

        Careers

        Life at AppNexus

        Teams

        Getting Hired

        Students

        Open Roles

     * (BUTTON) Log In

        Log In

        AppNexus Console

        Open AdStream (Europe)

        Open AdStream (North America-17)

        Open AdStream (North America-18)

   [en]
   (BUTTON) ×
   Search _______________
   Search

Main navigation

     * (BUTTON) Products

        Products

                Powerful enterprise technology for buyers and sellers

        Buy

                Programmatically buy media that delivers better outcomes

              AppNexus Programmable Platform

                      Deliver better outcomes through our customizable DSP

        Sell

                Get the most from every impression

              AppNexus Adserver

                      Serve your ads efficiently and transparently

              AppNexus SSP

                      Manage your programmatic demand in all formats and
                      channels

              Yieldex Analytics

                      Get a complete picture of your data and inventory

              Audience Extension

                      Understand your audience better than anyone else

     * (BUTTON) Marketplace

        Marketplace

                World’s leading destination for quality, efficient and
                brand-safe digital advertising

        Buy

                Buy in the largest independent marketplace

        Sell

                Sell in the largest independent marketplace

     * (BUTTON) Insights

        Insights

                Check out our white papers, case studies, and data-driven
                ad tech insights

        Blog Hub

                Our corporate, product, and tech blogs

        Customer Success

                Case studies on customer success

        Whitepapers

                Reports on digital advertising trends and best practices

   Contact
   Search _______________
   Search
   Cancel

Main navigation

     * Products
          + Buy

              AppNexus Programmable Platform

          + Sell

              AppNexus Adserver
              AppNexus SSP
              Yieldex Analytics
              Audience Extension

     * Marketplace
          + Buy
          + Sell
     * Insights
          + Blog Hub
          + Customer Success
          + Whitepapers

Quick Links

     * Careers
          + Life at AppNexus
          + Teams
          + Getting Hired
          + Students
          + Open Roles
     * Log In
          + AppNexus Console
          + Open AdStream (Europe)
          + Open AdStream (North America-17)
          + Open AdStream (North America-18)

   Change Region
   [en]
   Search
   Contact

AppNexus Platform Privacy Policy

   []

   Datenschutzerklärung

   Déclaration de Confidentialité

   AppNexus Inc. is a New York-headquartered advertising technology
   company. When our technology is used by companies running websites,
   apps and other internet-connected properties, it helps those companies
   generate revenue by assisting them in showing advertisements to their
   users. When our technology is used by marketers and other advertisers,
   it helps them show advertisements to individuals online who may be
   interested in their products or services.

   If you are interested in learning about how we collect, use, and
   disclose information through our digital advertising technology
   Platform, you have come to the right place.

   If you are interested in learning how we collect, use, and disclose
   information through other corporate activities, such as on our
   corporate website, AppNexus.com, please click here.

   To go directly to our opt out, click here.

What is in this document?

   This document provides information about our digital advertising
   technology services and then describes how we collect, use, share and
   otherwise process information.

   Our goal is to be transparent about our business by describing our
   technology and services in simple terms so that you can understand our
   practices.

   We know this is complicated, so if you have any questions about this
   information, please contact us here.

   We also created an Online Advertising and Ad Tech Glossary if you want
   to learn more about our technology, our services and more generally
   about the advertising technology ecosystem.

   You'll find the following information in this document:
    1. Background Information
          + What is the AppNexus Platform?
          + What do we mean by Platform Data?
          + For EEA Internet Users, the meaning of "Personal Data" under
            the General Data Protection Regulation and what this means for
            Platform Data
          + Glossary of Basic Terms
          + Cookie use by the Platform
    2. The AppNexus Platform Privacy Statement:
          + Overview
          + What information does AppNexus collect and use?
          + What information do our clients, partners and vendors collect
            and use?
          + How do we collect information?
          + How do we use the information we collect?
          + Legal basis for processing Personal Data (EEA Internet users
            only)
          + How and why do we share the information we collect?
          + How is information stored and how long is it kept?
          + What are your choices?
               o IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework
               o Opt Out
          + What are your personal data rights?
               o European Data Subject Rights
               o Privacy Shield related rights
          + Industry Self-Regulation
          + Data Transfers for Internet Users in the EEA and the EU-US and
            Swiss-US Privacy Shield Framework
          + Contact Us
          + What are your personal data rights?
               o DPO
               o Data Controller

What is the AppNexus Platform (or the "Platform")?

   AppNexus is not an ad network or a data broker. AppNexus is a digital
   advertising technology platform. We do not own digital properties on
   which we advertise and we partake in advertising in a limited manner
   for our own recruiting purposes and to advertise to other businesses
   (not to consumers). By "Platform," we mean we provide technology that
   websites, mobile apps and publishers of other internet-connected
   properties (such as internet-connected TV's), our sellers, use to sell
   ad space on their websites, mobile apps and other digital media
   properties (which we collectively refer to as "Digital Properties") and
   that advertisers or companies on the advertiser's behalf, our buyers,
   use to purchase that ad space in the most efficient way possible.
   Sellers want their ads to be relevant to their readers, which helps
   them to offer content for no cost or lower cost. Buyers want to use
   their advertising dollars efficiently by reaching the right audiences,
   and by measuring the effectiveness of their ads. To accomplish these
   goals, buyers and sellers and their partners use our Platform to engage
   in a variety of techniques, including interest-based advertising,
   real-time (or programmatic) advertising, contextual, and location-based
   advertising.

   The Platform also provides buyers and sellers other tools, like the
   ability to measure the effectiveness of their ads, to help prevent
   malware or other bad activity, and similar functions designed to make
   the buying and selling of ad space seamless, efficient, and effective.

   Buyers, sellers, and other companies may also use our Platform to buy
   and sell data to help make the ads that end users see more relevant.

What do we mean by Platform Data?

   The Platform is designed to use certain types of information, that all
   together we call Platform Data, which includes:
     * Information sent to or uploaded to our Platform by our clients and
       partners which may include information about you, such as IP
       address, unique device identifiers, and the latitude and longitude
       of your device when you view a website that wants to show you an ad
     * Information sent to or uploaded to our Platform by our clients and
       partners that ties unique device identifier(s) to perceived
       interests and behavior (e.g., women, ages 40-59), which may include
       information about you

   See "What Information we collect and use" for more details on the type
   of information we include in Platform Data.

   Some of this information (including for example IP addresses and
   certain unique device identifiers), may identify a particular computer
   or device, and may be considered "Personal Data" in some jurisdictions,
   including the European Union (see below on the meaning of "Personal
   Data"). This data allows us to recognize a particular computer or
   device over time.

   We do not allow information that by itself identifies an individual in
   the "real world", such as name, address, phone number, email address,
   or government identifier, to be used on the Platform. We also do not
   allow information that directly identifies an individual to be
   collected or used in connection with use of our Platform.

For EEA Internet Users, the meaning of "Personal Data" under the General Data
Protection Regulation ("GDPR"), and what this means for Platform Data

   "Personal Data" is defined as any data relating to a living individual
   who can be identified directly from that data, or indirectly in
   conjunction with other information. It can take the form of a name or
   address, and can extend to unique identifiers, IP addresses and other
   identifiers which do not tell us who an Internet user is in the "real
   world" but may, when combined with other information, allow the
   identification of a living individual.

   We do not collect personal data that identifies you as an individual in
   the "real world." When you (an Internet user) visit a Digital Property
   that has integrated our technology or that uses technology that
   integrates with our Platform, we do not know your name or email address
   or other information that directly identifies you. We take care to
   ensure that we do not collect any information that tells us who you
   are.

   Instead, when you first visit a Digital Property that has integrated
   our technology, this triggers a request to our Platform to fill ad
   space or measure information about an ad shown to you. When this
   occurs, we assign a random unique identifier (a Digital Identifier) an
   "AppNexus ID," to your browser or device, which allows the Platform to
   automatically recognize your browser or device the next time it visits
   another Digital Property that has integrated our technology. This type
   of "pseudonymous data" is defined as "Personal Data" under the GDPR.

   This allows our clients and certain third party provider to sync their
   own Digital Identifiers against this AppNexus ID (see ID Synching
   below) so that our clients and certain third party provider can use
   their own data on the Platform that they may have associated with their
   own Digital Identifiers.

   We use Platform Data both as an independent controller and as a data
   processor.

Glossary of basic terms

   Ad Server: An ad server, in its simplest form, is the computer
   responsible for delivering an ad to be shown in a web page or a mobile
   app. Today, communications may be sent to several servers in the
   process of selecting and delivering an ad. This occurs in a matter of
   milliseconds (thousandths of a second).

   Beacons, Pixels, Tags, and SDKs: Beacons (also sometimes referred to as
   web beacons or pixels) and tags are elements included in web pages to
   enable companies to collect data, serve advertising, and provide
   related services, such as measuring ad effectiveness or preventing fake
   ad traffic. They do this by allowing communication between a web
   browser and a server. A beacon is a small transparent image that is
   placed on a web page. A tag is a small piece of website code that is
   run by the web browser. An SDK is a piece of computer code that
   developers include in their mobile applications.

   Browser: A browser or web browser is the user interface or application
   through which you view Digital Properties. Examples of prominent
   browsers are Microsoft's Internet Explorer, Google's Chrome, Apple's
   Safari, and Mozilla's Firefox.

   Cookie: A cookie is a small text file that is stored in a web browser
   by a website or Ad Server. By saving information in a cookie, websites
   and servers can remember preferences or recognize web browsers from one
   visit to another or from one website to another.

   Cross-Device Mapping: Cross-device mapping is the process of making
   inferences that certain devices are related to each other, i.e. they
   belong to the same user or household. This is done using either
   "statistical" or "deterministic" methods (or a combination).
   "Statistical" refers to using mathematical techniques to make
   intelligent guesses that certain devices are related. "Deterministic"
   means using known relationships, for example logins that use the same
   email address or other personal information, to link multiple devices
   to a single user. When this method is used companies typically mask the
   actual email address.

   Device Identifiers: Cookies, Mobile Advertising Identifiers or other
   identifiers that do not identify an individual but identify a specific
   device.

   ID Synching: ID synching (sometimes also referred to as cookie syncing)
   is a common and long-standing process in the digital advertising
   industry. It enables advertisers to link up data from multiple
   advertising platforms. (In other words, it helps advertisers buy ads in
   more than one place.)

   Here's an example of how it works. Let's say you sell a product on your
   website. A customer visits your site. Your website stores a cookie to
   identify that customer's browser, and the cookie contains an ID of
   12345. You then associate that ID with information about what the
   customer shopped for on your site.

   If you want to then use that information to advertise to that user, you
   might go to an online advertising marketplace to buy ad space. In order
   to buy the right ad space to show your ads to the right user, you'll
   need to match your ID, which is 12345 to the ID that the marketplace
   has assigned to the same customer (which let's say for this example is
   ABCDE).

   The result is a record that says ID 12345 = Marketplace ID ABCDE. That
   way, when the marketplace offers to sell you ad space to show you're ad
   to to ABCDE, your system will know that ABCDE is the same as 12345, and
   you can pick the right ad to show the customer.

   Interest-Based Advertising: Interest-based advertising uses information
   collected across multiple web sites or mobile apps to predict users'
   preferences and to show ads that are most likely to be of interest to
   them. For example, if a user visits a travel site or uses a travel app,
   she might see travel-related ads on another site or app and the ads may
   be about the destinations or kinds of trip the user has looked at.
   Advertisers may also use other information they have or can acquire
   about users' interests and demographic information like age group and
   approximately where a user lives. Users have choices with respect to
   this type of advertising, as discussed below.

   Mobile Advertising Identifiers: Mobile advertising IDs (e.g., Apple's
   iOs Identifier for Advertising (IDFA) or Google's Android Advertising
   ID (AAID)) are unique IDs that are similar to cookies, but instead of
   being stored on your web browser, they are associated with individual
   mobile devices.Mobile Advertising Identifiers do not reveal a user's
   real world identity. They usually are user-resettable. Mobile
   Advertising Identifiers are used in connection with apps on your mobile
   device as opposed to websites that you access through a browser.

   Non-Cookie Technology: Companies sometimes use alternative methods that
   perform functions similar to cookies in order to identify unique
   browsers or devices. For example, some platforms, such as Apple's iOS
   and Google's Play Services for Android, provide unique IDs to be used
   for advertising. Additionally, mathematical or statistical techniques
   are sometimes used to try to identify devices. These "Statistical
   Identifiers" are not 100% accurate.

   Precise Geographic Location: Your device may be capable of sharing your
   precise geographic location with the apps or web pages you visit using
   that device. Devices use one or more methods to determine your
   location, including GPS coordinates and information about wifi networks
   in your vicinity. (Geographic location determined from IP address is
   typically not considered to be "precise.") Devices such as iPhone or
   Android phones typically ask for users' consent before installing or
   using an app that accesses the device's precise geographic location.
   The app, in turn, may make this information available to third-party
   advertising companies in order to make the ads you see more relevant.

   Real-Time Transactions (Also called Real-Time Bidding, Real-Time
   Advertising or Programmatic Advertising): Advertising buyers are able
   to bid in "real time" for the opportunity to show an online
   advertisement when a web page is loaded or an app is used. The winning
   bidder gets to show its ad.

   Of course, the explanations above are simplified. There are many
   resources available on the web to learn more about these concepts and
   online advertising in general. Although we have no responsibility for
   the content of these sites, we offer the following as good places to
   learn more:
     * OnGuardOnline.gov: onguardonline.gov
     * All About Cookies: www.allaboutcookies.org
     * Wikipedia: en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Online_advertising
     * AboutAds.info, For Consumers page: www.aboutads.info/consumers
     * The Network Advertising Initiativ:
       networkadvertising.org/managing/learn_more.asp
     * In the EU: www.youronlinechoices.com
     * About web browser cookie settings: - Internet Explorer:
       http://windows.microsoft.com/en-US/internet-explorer/delete-manage-
       cookies#ie=ie-11 - Firefox: support.mozilla.com/en-US/kb/Cookies -
       Chrome: www.google.com/support/chrome - Safari:
       http://support.apple.com/kb/PH19214?viewlocale=en_US&locale=en_US

Cookie use by the Platform

   Although the specific cookies employed on the AppNexus Platform may
   change from time to time, this describes how and why the AppNexus
   Platform uses cookies. These cookies enable our clients to target ads
   to users, to evaluate how well their ads work, and to see users'
   opt-out choices. For a detailed description of cookies set by the
   Platform, see AppNexus Cookies.
     * The Platform uses unique cookies to distinguish between unique web
       browsers, and to store data for advertising purposes, including
       interest-based advertising.
     * The Platform uses unique cookies to store ad delivery and reporting
       data for clients, such as, for example, which ad was shown, the
       number of times a particular ad has been shown, and how recently an
       ad was shown to a particular web browser.
     * The Platform uses unique cookies to enable ad buyers to track
       users' responses (i.e. whether a user clicked on an ad, visited a
       website or bought something after seeing an ad) to ads purchased on
       the platform.
     * The Platform uses cookies with non-unique values for server
       load-balancing and similar technical purposes.
     * The Platform uses non-unique cookies to store users' opt-out
       choices.
     * The Platform may also use some Non-Cookie Technologies for these
       purposes (as defined above and as detailed below).
     * Cookies play a role in Cross-Device linking in that cookies from
       different browsers or devices might be associated with each other.
     * Some browsers or other software may be configured to block 3rd
       party cookies by default.

THE APPNEXUS PLATFORM PRIVACY STATEMENT

   Last Modified: 05/24/2018 (view archived versions)

   Overview
   This privacy statement describes how AppNexus collects, uses, shares or
   otherwise processes Platform Data. It may describe how AppNexus enables
   or allows clients and third-party providers to use Platform Data, but
   otherwise does not apply to our clients' or other third parties'
   practices.

   Companies using the Platform own their own data, and AppNexus retains
   limited rights to use Platform Data to run the Platform and provide and
   improve our advertising technology services. That's part of what makes
   it a Platform.

   What information do we collect and use?

   The Platform is designed to collect and use only Platform Data as
   described in this document. Details.

   How do we collect information?

   The Platform uses Cookies, Beacons, Pixels, Tags, mobile SDKs, and some
   Non-Cookie technologies to collect and store Platform Data about web
   browsers and devices across web sites and apps and over time. Details.

   For what purposes do we use the collected information?

   AppNexus uses the information collected on the Platform to provide,
   operate, manage, maintain, and enhance the Platform and allow our
   clients to use our Platform. This means facilitating: serving of ads,
   including interest-based advertising by our clients and partners;
   facilitating serving of ads based on Precise Geographic Location
   information; reporting on ad delivery and conversions; providing
   frequency capping and recency measurement; using information for fraud
   detection and the prevention and detection of malicious behavior and
   maintaining and enhancing our services including using information for
   machine learning, optimization and statistical analysis. Details.

   On what legal basis do we process Personal Data

   Where you are located in the European Economic Area (the "EEA") and
   where AppNexus is a controller of personal data, AppNexus' legal basis
   for collecting and using the personal data described below depends on
   the data concerned and the specific context in which we collect or use
   it. We normally rely on our legitimate interests to collect and use
   personal data, except where our interests are overridden by your data
   protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. Our legitimate
   interests are described in more detail below (see "How do we use the
   information we collect") and include the operation of our Platform and
   business and the provision of our online advertising technology
   services to our clients as required by our agreements with them. In
   some cases, we may rely on your consent which is obtained for us by the
   operator of the Digital Properties that use our technology or use
   technology that interacts with our Platform. Additionally, we may have
   a legal obligation to collect personal data. Details.

   What information do we share with third parties?

   Where permitted, we provide clients and third-party providers access to
   their Platform Data that they collect, acquire, or use on the Platform,
   and typically they may remove it from the Platform for their own use.
   For a current list of third party providers who may, subject to our
   clients' permission, receive your data, see here. AppNexus may also
   provide Platform Data to our partners and service providers for the
   purpose of operating, managing, maintaining, or enhancing our services,
   including for the safety and security of the Platform and the online
   industry, or as required by law. AppNexus does not share the
   information collected on the Platform with other third parties, unless
   legally required. Details.

   How is the information stored and how long is it kept?

   Platform Data is stored using generally accepted security standards. It
   is usually aggregated or deleted within 3-60 days, but may be retained
   in the Platform for up to 18 months from the date of collection before
   aggregation or deletion. Details.

   What are your choices?

   For EEA users, we are registered as a vendor with, and support, the IAB
   Europe Transparency and Consent Framework (the "Industry Framework").
   As a Platform, various clients and third party providers using our
   Platform may be accessing your device or collecting, using and sharing
   your personal data as independent controllers for different uses and
   based on different legal bases or as processors on behalf of other
   independent controllers. When you visit a Digital Property, the
   Industry Framework is designed to allow Digital Properties the means to
   choose which third parties they wish to allow to access your device and
   collect, use and share your personal data and provide dynamic
   transparency and choice to you about each of these third parties
   (either an opportunity for you to consent or opt out) in connection
   with your visit to the Digital Property, depending on that
   third-party's use of your personal data and legal basis.

   Web browser users may opt out of the use of the Platform for
   interest-based advertising in their web browser. Mobile app users have
   access to choices provided by certain apps or in their device system
   software. Details.

   What happens if this privacy statement is changed?

   Check this policy for changes. The date of the last update can be found
   at the top of this Policy. Material changes will not be applied to
   previously collected Platform Data. Details.

   Questions?

   Send a message here.

What Information Do We Collect and Use?

   Platform Data

   When you visit a Digital Property (i.e. a site) that uses our
   technology (or that uses technology that transacts with parties using
   our Platform) we collect or receive certain information about you and
   your device including:
     * Information about your browser including:
          + the type of browser
          + browser language
          + browser settings
          + cookie information

     * Information about your device including:
          + information about the device's operating system including its
            version and connection type
          + device make, device model
          + Device Identifiers such as your IDFA or AAID
          + Precise Geographic Location data when location services have
            been enabled for an app on your device that has integrated our
            technology or that sends that information to our Platform
          + the IP address from which the device accesses a client's
            Digital Property

     * Information about your activity on a Digital Property including web
       pages or apps visited or used and the time those web pages or apps
       were visited or used. Note this information is only collected and
       received by us in connection with requests to us initiated by
       Digital Properties using our technology to show ads to you or to
       track your activity in connection with the delivery of an ad or to
       place Digital Identifiers associated with your browser or device
       into interest-based segments. This means we do not passively track
       your activity but only receive information about your activity in
       connection with requests specifically made to our Platform to serve
       you an ad, measure your interaction with an ad or to place you into
       an interest-based category for future use by a client to help make
       the ads they show to you more relevant.

     * Information about ads served, viewed or clicked on, including the
       type of ad, where the ad was served, whether you clicked on it and
       whether you visited the advertiser's website or downloaded the
       advertiser's app.

     * Information about you or inferences about your interests that a
       seller, buyer or third-party provider has collected about you and
       shared with us such as information about your interests or
       demographic information (your age or gender) or to help make the
       ads served to you more relevant. For clarity, we do not
       independently collect information about your interests or
       demographic information for use within our Platform, but we do
       allow our clients and third party providerss to utilize their own
       data or third-party data they have access to in connection with the
       Services.

     * Information about your Internet service including information about
       which Internet Service Provider (ISP) is used by you.

   Data from Third-Party Sources

   The Platform allows clients to use information about you such as
   demographic information (e.g. your age or gender) or information about
   your interests provided by third-party sources such as third-party data
   providers and our clients' data management platforms in order to show
   more relevant ads to you.

   Clients, data providers and data management platforms may use ID
   Synching to enable the use of this information through the Platform.

Information Our Clients, our Vendors and our Clients Third Party Providers
Collect

   Our clients, our vendors, and our clients' third party providers, who
   use our technology, may use their own tags, pixels, cookies, or other
   similar technology (or those of their other affiliates) within their
   advertisements and on certain Digital Properties. We are not
   responsible for our clients, vendors and/or our clients' third party
   providers. use of such tracking technologies or for their privacy
   practices.

How Do We Collect Information?

     * The Platform uses Cookies, Beacons, Pixels, Tags, mobile SDKs, and
       in some cases Non-Cookie technologies, to collect data associated
       with particular web browsers or devices
     * The Platforms also receives data from Clients and Third-Party
       Sources (as set out above)

How do we use the information we collect?

     * For our legitimate business interests to provide services to our
       clients, including:
          + Providing and Operating our Services which includes:
          + Compiling statistics about the advertising transactions
            occurring through our Platform and conducting research and
            development for our own internal business purposes, such as
            analyzing campaign forecasting including conducting machine
            learning to better help our clients' sale of ad space and our
            clients' delivery of ads to you
          + Analyzing and reporting on campaign and ad performance (such
            as reporting to buyers about when and how you have been
            exposed to ads or clicked on ads and reporting to sellers
            information about when and how ads were shown on their Digital
            Properties and whether they were clicked on)
          + Investigating, protecting against and deterring malicious
            activity, fake traffic or fraudulent, unauthorized or illegal
            activity on the Platform and on the internet
     * Hands on Help: The Platform enables AppNexus' clients to collect,
       buy, and sell data and to use Platform Data to buy and sell online
       advertising. Sometime AppNexus staff give "hands-on" help to
       clients using the Platform for these purposes, for example by
       configuring advertising campaigns for clients to best meet their
       objectives.
     * Allowing our Clients to use Platform Data for the following
       advertising-related purposes:
          + Interested Based Advertising: Using Platform Data to infer
            what you may be interested in and to serve ads to you based on
            these inferred interests. Our clients may use their Platform
            Data to create interest profiles about you but AppNexus does
            not create or use interest profiles about you for use by us or
            across our clients. Any interest profile used on our Platform
            is created by or for a client to be used by that client or by
            another client or clients (as permissioned by the client that
            created the interest profile).
          + Frequency Capping: Limiting the number of times you see an ad
            so you don't see the same ad or type of ad too many times
          + Showing ads in a particular sequence: Showing you ads in a
            particular order to provide a better user experience
          + Geo-Targeting: Customizing ads shown to you based on your
            current or prior location
          + Contextual Ads: Showing ads to you based on the content you
            are viewing
          + Ad Measurement: Understanding how users respond to ads (e.g.,
            clicking on the ad)
          + Aggregated Statistics: Reporting aggregated statistics
            regarding, for example, the effectiveness of online
            advertising campaigns
          + Cross-Device Mapping: Enabling Cross-Device Mapping in order
            to serve or measure advertising on related devices on behalf
            of our clients.

   Typically, companies using the AppNexus Platform own the information
   that they provide to and get from the Platform. While we take care to
   obtain assurances from our clients and partners that their use of
   information collected through the use of our technology will comply
   with applicable laws, when clients remove their information from the
   Platform, their use of that information is governed by their own
   privacy policies and applicable laws, rules, or regulations.

Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data (EEA Internet users only)

   If you are located in the EEA, where we are the controller of personal
   data, our legal basis for processing the personal data described above
   under "What Information do we Collect and Use" will depend on the data
   concerned and the specific context in which we collect or use it.

   However, we normally rely on our legitimate interest to collect
   personal data, except where such interests are overridden by an
   Internet user's data protection interests or fundamental rights and
   freedoms. Our legitimate interests are the operation of our platform
   and business and the provision of online advertising services to our
   clients as required by our agreements with them. In some cases, we may
   rely on the user's consent obtained by the operator of the Digital
   Properties that use our technology or have a legal obligation to
   collect User Information, or use Platform Data, or may otherwise need
   the Platform Data. Where we rely on our legitimate interests to process
   an Internet User's User Information, they include the interests
   described in the section titled "How do we use the information we
   collect?"

   In some cases, we may rely on our consent which Digital Properties
   using our technology obtain from you. We may also have a legal
   obligation to collect personal data from you. If we rely on consent to
   process your data, we will obtain such consent in compliance with
   applicable laws.

   If you have questions about or need further information concerning the
   legal basis on which we process personal data, please contact us here.

How and why do we share the information we collect?

   AppNexus shares Platform Data with third parties in the following
   cases:
     * Clients and third party vendors
          + When you visit a Digital Property (i.e. a site) and that
            Digital Property wants to show you ads, in order to show you
            those ads, the Digital Property must let certain third parties
            access your device or receive and use the information noted
            above under "What Information do we collect and use."
          + Depending on how those third parties collect and use that
            information, those parties may be:
               o independently making decisions about how your data is
                 used in different ways, for different reasons based on
                 different legal bases
               o using your data strictly at the instruction of another
                 party solely on behalf of that party
          + As such, at the instruction of our clients, we share
            information with clients and third party vendors:
               o so that they can decide whether to bid on ad inventory or
                 serve an advertisement and choose the best ad for you
                 using their data and our and our partners' technology
                 (and measure and report on those ads after they're
                 delivered)
               o so that certain of them can create demographic and
                 interest profiles to help our clients choose the best ad
                 for you using our and our partners' technology
               o so that they can improve their products and services for
                 use by us and others across the broader online
                 advertising ecosystem (e.g. your Device Identifier may be
                 used to improve fraud detection services)
          + When our clients integrate our technology in order to show you
            ads and enable us to collect your data, other than for the
            reasons noted below, we do not decide which third parties may
            receive your information.
          + For users located within the EEA, we provide our clients with
            various controls to choose the third parties with whom we
            share your information that we collect through each client's
            use of our Platform including:
               o IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework:
                    # We are registered as a vendor with, and support, the
                      IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework (the
                      "Industry Framework")
                    # When you visit a Digital Property, the Industry
                      Framework is designed to allow a Digital Property to
                      choose which third parties (vendors) they wish to
                      allow to access your device and use your personal
                      data and provide dynamic transparency and choice to
                      you about each of these vendors (either an
                      opportunity for you to consent or opt out) in
                      connection with your visit to the Digital Property,
                      depending on that third-party's use of your data and
                      legal basis.
               o Information about third parties operating through our
                 Platform and Platform Controls:
                    # Information about third parties operating through
                      our Platform for disclosure purposes and
                      whitelisting capabilities - essentially creating
                      lists of approved companies - to control which third
                      parties may receive and use your information
          + For users located outside of the EEA, we provide our clients
            with Platform Controls, including our whitelisting
            capabilities, to control which third parties may receive your
            information.
     * Service Providers (including data centers, hosting providers,
       anti-fraud, technology and security providers): We share with
       Service Providers (or enable their collection of) Platform Data so
       that they can perform functions and provide services to us
       including for purposes of protecting the safety and security of the
       online ecosystem, including to detect and prevent malicious
       activity or fake traffic. Our Service Providers are subject to
       obligations consistent with this Privacy Policy and appropriate
       confidentiality and security measures.
     * Legal Rights and Compliance with Law: We may also disclose Platform
       Data in the event that we reasonably suspect malicious activity or
       fake traffic or when we reasonably believe it is required by law,
       subpoena or other legal process, including to meet national
       security or law enforcement requirements.
     * AppNexus Affiliates: We share Platform Data with other companies in
       the AppNexus group of companies to use for any of the purposes
       described in this Privacy Policy.
     * Business Transfers: We may transfer Platform Data to a successor
       entity in connection with a corporate merger, consolidation, sale
       of assets, bankruptcy, or other corporate change.
     * Aggregated Data: We may also share aggregated data derived from the
       Platform, including, for example, statistics about Platform
       activity.

How is Platform Data Stored and How Long is it Kept?

   Security
     * AppNexus uses generally accepted industry security standards to
       protect information transmitted over or stored on the Platform.
     * We review our information collection, storage and processing
       practices, including physical security measures, to guard against
       unauthorized access to systems.
     * We restrict access to information to employees, contractors and
       agents who need the information in order to process it for us, and
       who are subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations
       and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these
       obligations.
     * Please note, however, that no transmission or storage of
       information can ever be guaranteed to be completely secure. Once we
       receive Platform Data, we will use strict procedures and security
       features to try to prevent unauthorized access. Please also be
       mindful that we are not responsible for the security measures of
       third parties.

   Retention
     * We never store any information longer than we need it. Platform
       Data is usually aggregated or deleted within 3-60 days, but may be
       retained in the Platform for up to 18 months for specific clients
       and for use for security and the detection and prevention of fraud
       and invalid traffic from the date of collection before aggregation
       or deletion. When we no longer need the information we collect, it
       is deleted or aggregated.
     * Aggregated information is used for reporting and analysis, and may
       be stored in the Platform for up to 2 additional years.
     * When third party vendors receive information through us or clients
       remove their information from the Platform, their storage and
       retention of the removed information is governed by their own
       privacy policies and applicable laws, rules, or regulations.

What are your choices?

   IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework: If you are located in
   the EEA and visiting a Digital Property, we are registered as a vendor
   with, support and encourage our clients to use the IAB Europe
   Transparency and Consent Framework (the "Industry Framework") to
   provide you with dynamic transparency into and choice about the various
   third parties our clients use to serve you ads, including ourselves.
   When you visit a Digital Property, the Industry Framework is designed
   to allow a Digital Property the means to choose which vendors they wish
   to allow to access your device and process your personal data and
   provide dynamic transparency and choice to you about each of these
   vendors (either an opportunity for you to consent to the vendor or opt
   out of data processing by the vendor depending on that vendor's legal
   basis and use of your personal data).

   Opt Out of Interest-Based Advertising: You can opt out of
   interest-based advertising.

   AppNexus Web Browser Opt Out: You can click below to opt out of having
   the Platform used to select ads for your browser based on your online
   web browsing behavior. When you opt out, an opt out cookie (from
   adnxs.com) will be stored in your web browser. The Platform will know
   the choice you have made when it sees your opt out cookie, and will
   apply your choice to all companies' using the Platform. If you block or
   delete the opt out cookie, you will not be opted out and will need to
   allow cookies from AppNexus and renew your opt-out choice.

   []

   (BUTTON) Opt Out

   To review your opt-in status, please visit the Network Advertising
   Initiative opt-out page.

   Important things to note about the opt out:
     * Blocked cookies: The opt out cookie may not work if your browser is
       configured to block third-party cookies.
     * Deleting or protecting opt outs: If you delete your cookies, you
       will need to opt out again. There are browser plugins to help you
       preserve your opt out cookies. For more information, please visit
       https://www.aboutads.info/.
     * Only this browser: The opt out only applies to the browser profile
       in which you set it. For example, if you set the opt out while
       using Firefox, but then use Chrome, the opt out will not be active
       in Chrome. To opt out in Chrome, you will need to repeat the opt
       out process. This is because the cookies cannot be read between
       different browsers or browser profiles.
     * The opt out does not block or delete cookies: It also does not
       prevent the use of cookies or other technologies for purposes other
       than selecting ads based on your interests as inferred by your
       online behavior. If you opt out, data may still be collected about
       your web browsing activities and you will still see advertising.
       Ads may be selected, for example, based on the content of the web
       page in which they are shown. If you wish to block or delete
       cookies altogether, you can use web browser settings to do so.
     * Learn More: To learn more about interest-based advertising, and to
       access the opt outs of other online advertising companies, visit
       the Network Advertising Initiative opt out page.

   AppNexus Mobile App Opt Out: Mobile device system software such as
   Apple iOS or Google Play Services provide mechanisms that allow users
   to opt out of the use of information about their usage of mobile apps
   to deliver targeted ads to their mobile device. For more information,
   or to opt out using these mechanisms, consult your device settings
   ("Opt out of Interest-Based Ads" on Android devices and "Limit Ad
   Tracking" on iOS devices).

   Location: Most mobile devices offer you the ability to stop the
   collection of location information at any time by changing the
   preferences on your device. You may also be able to stop the collection
   of location information by particular apps by adjusting the settings
   for individual apps or following the standard uninstall process to
   remove specific mobile apps from your device. Note when location
   services have not been enabled in any of your apps, we will still infer
   data about your location based on your IP address.

What are your personal data access rights?

   We collect the minimum amount of personal data about you that is
   necessary to provide our Services. Because we do not collect and we
   prohibit clients and third party vendors from storing information that
   directly identifies an individual on the Platform, it is generally not
   feasible for us to provide individuals information that is tied to
   their identities.

European Data Subject Rights

   If you are a resident of a country in the EEA, you have certain rights
   and protections under the law regarding the collection, processing, and
   use of information about you. As stated above, the information we
   collect about you when you visit Digital Properties that use our
   advertising technology may include certain identifiers that are
   considered "Personal Data" under European law. We process this data as
   necessary to further the legitimate interests of our customers, who
   rely on the ability to deliver, to you and other users, advertisements
   (including targeted advertisements) in order to fund the online content
   they deliver to you.

   As a resident of a country in the EEA, you have the right to: (i) to
   request access and obtain a copy of your personal data, (ii) to request
   rectification or, in certain circumstances, and subject to some
   specific legal reasons where we may need to retain data, erasure; (iii)
   to restrict the processing of your personal data; and (iv) if
   applicable, to data portability. In certain circumstances, you may also
   have the right to object to the processing of your personal data.

   If you are interested in exercising any of these rights, please see our
   Data Subject Rights Policy.

   Finally, as a resident of the EEA, you have the right to lodge a
   complaint about our processing of personal data with a European Data
   Protection Authority in particular, the Member State of your residence,
   place of work or alleged infringement of the GDPR. For contact details
   of your relevant local Data Protection Authority, please see here.

Privacy Shield related rights

   If you believe that AppNexus holds information that would allow us to
   correct, amend or delete inaccurate information about you or that
   information about you has been processed in violation of the EU-US
   Privacy Shield's Principles, please contact us here.

   We will seek to provide access to such data, but will not be able to do
   so when the burden or expense of providing access would be
   disproportionate to the risks to the individual's privacy in the case
   in question, or where the rights of persons other than the individual
   would be violated.

Industry Self-Regulation

   AppNexus supports industry self-regulation, and endorses best practices
   and self-regulatory requirements that apply to the Platform. AppNexus
   is a member in good standing of the Network Advertising Initiative
   (NAI), and adheres to the NAI Code of Conduct for Web and Mobile.

   Additionally, the following industry sites provide useful information
   about industry self-regulation of interest-based advertising:
     * US: www.networkadvertising.org and www.aboutads.info
     * EU: www.youronlinechoices.com

Global Operations and Privacy Shield

   AppNexus is a global company headquartered in the United States with
   data centers located in the United States, Europe and Asia. If you
   access any of the Digital Properties that use our technology, please be
   aware that your information may be transferred to, stored and processed
   by us and our affiliates in our facilities in the United States and
   other countries (including in Singapore, Japan, Australia and Brazil
   where our global affiliates have offices) and by those third parties
   with whom we may share your information.

   These countries (including the United States) may not provide an
   adequate level of data protection for your information (as determined
   by the European Commission) or have data protection or other laws as
   comprehensive as those in your country. We will, however, ensure that
   where AppNexus group companies or third-party service providers receive
   information outside of the EEA, appropriate protections are in place
   under European data protection legislation (which includes either Model
   Clauses or Privacy Shield compliance).

   For example, in order to ensure that your information is adequately
   protected when transferred outside of the EEA, AppNexus has entered
   into inter-company "model clause" agreements and other adequacy
   arrangements with other various entities located outside the EEA with
   whom we share your information. A copy of such agreements is available
   on request.

   Additionally, if we transfer personal information from the European
   Union to the United States or Switzerland to the United States, we
   comply with the EU-US Privacy Shield Framework and the Swiss-US Privacy
   Shield Framework as set forth by the US Department of Commerce
   regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information
   transferred from the European Union and Switzerland to the United
   States, respectively. AppNexus has certified to the Department of
   Commerce that it adheres to the Privacy Shield Principles. To learn
   more about the Privacy Shield program, and to view our certification,
   please visit https://www.privacyshield.gov/.

   For any questions or complaints regarding our compliance with either
   the EU-US Privacy Shield Framework and the Swiss-US Privacy Shield
   Framework, please contact us here.

   If AppNexus does not resolve your complaint, you may submit your
   complaint free of charge to ICDR/AAA, AppNexus' designated independent
   dispute resolution provider. Under certain conditions specified by the
   principles of the EU-US and the Swiss-US Privacy Shield Frameworks,
   respectively, you may also be able to invoke binding arbitration to
   resolve your complaint. AppNexus is subject to the investigatory and
   enforcement powers of the FTC. If AppNexus shares the personal data of
   an individual located in the EU or Switzerland with a third-party
   service provider that processes the data solely on AppNexus' behalf,
   then AppNexus will be liable for that third-party's processing of that
   data in violation of the Principles, unless AppNexus can prove that it
   is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.

What Happens if this Privacy Statement is Changed?

   Check this page for changes. We may change this privacy statement at
   any time.

   If we make changes that, in our sole discretion, are material, those
   changes will not be applied to information collected prior to the date
   the changes went into effect.

Contact Us

   If you have questions about privacy on the AppNexus Platform, you can
   send us a message here.

   If you are located in the EEA, you can confidentially contact our Data
   Protection Officer here.

   You can also contact us by post using the details provided below:
   AppNexus Inc.
   Attn: Chief Privacy Counsel
   28 West 23rd Street
   Floor 4
   New York, NY 10010
   USA

   Important note:Where AppNexus is the data controller of EEA residents'
   personal data, the data controller is AppNexus Inc. As previously
   noted, the data controller of Platform Data will vary depending on how
   it is collected and by whom. At the point of collection, this
   information should be made available to you by or on behalf of any
   other data controller.

Footer

   Appnexus Logo

   28 W. 23rd Street
   New York, New York, 10010

Buy

   AppNexus Programmable Platform (DSP)

Sell

   AppNexus Adserver AppNexus SSP Audience Extension Yieldex Analytics

Marketplace

   Buy Sell

Insights

   Blog Hub Customer Success Thought Leadership Documentation Center

Company

   About Diversity and Inclusion Social Impact Leadership Press Locations
   Events
   See More

Careers

   Life at AppNexus Teams Getting Hired Tech Hub Students Open Roles
     * Copyright © 2019 AppNexus, A Xandr Company. All Rights Reserved.
     * Terms of Use
     * Trademarks Worldwide
     * Corporate Privacy Policy
     * Consumer Privacy
     * Candidate Privacy Policy
     * Opt Out
     * Copyright © 2019 AppNexus, A Xandr Company. All Rights Reserved.

     *
     *
     *
     *

   BACK TO TOP

   AppNexus and our partners use technology such as cookies on our site to
   personalize content, provide social media features, and analyze our
   traffic. Click below to consent to the use of this technology by
   AppNexus and these 3rd parties across the web. You can change your mind
   and revisit your consent choices at any time by returning to this site.
   GOT IT! Learn more
   #alternate

   Skip to main content

   (BUTTON)

Quick Links

     * (BUTTON) Careers

        Careers

        Life at AppNexus

        Teams

        Getting Hired

        Students

        Open Roles

     * (BUTTON) Log In

        Log In

        AppNexus Console

        Open AdStream (Europe)

        Open AdStream (North America-17)

        Open AdStream (North America-18)

   [en]
   (BUTTON) ×
   Search _______________
   Search

Main navigation

     * (BUTTON) Products

        Products

                Powerful enterprise technology for buyers and sellers

        Buy

                Programmatically buy media that delivers better outcomes

              AppNexus Programmable Platform

                      Deliver better outcomes through our customizable DSP

        Sell

                Get the most from every impression

              AppNexus Adserver

                      Serve your ads efficiently and transparently

              AppNexus SSP

                      Manage your programmatic demand in all formats and
                      channels

              Yieldex Analytics

                      Get a complete picture of your data and inventory

              Audience Extension

                      Understand your audience better than anyone else

     * (BUTTON) Marketplace

        Marketplace

                World’s leading destination for quality, efficient and
                brand-safe digital advertising

        Buy

                Buy in the largest independent marketplace

        Sell

                Sell in the largest independent marketplace

     * (BUTTON) Insights

        Insights

                Check out our white papers, case studies, and data-driven
                ad tech insights

        Blog Hub

                Our corporate, product, and tech blogs

        Customer Success

                Case studies on customer success

        Whitepapers

                Reports on digital advertising trends and best practices

   Contact
   Search _______________
   Search
   Cancel

Main navigation

     * Products
          + Buy

              AppNexus Programmable Platform

          + Sell

              AppNexus Adserver
              AppNexus SSP
              Yieldex Analytics
              Audience Extension

     * Marketplace
          + Buy
          + Sell
     * Insights
          + Blog Hub
          + Customer Success
          + Whitepapers

Quick Links

     * Careers
          + Life at AppNexus
          + Teams
          + Getting Hired
          + Students
          + Open Roles
     * Log In
          + AppNexus Console
          + Open AdStream (Europe)
          + Open AdStream (North America-17)
          + Open AdStream (North America-18)

   Change Region
   [en]
   Search
   Contact

   [seg?add=3359827&amp;t=2]

AppNexus Powers The Advertising That Powers The Internet

   Our mission is to create a better internet, and for us, that begins
   with advertising. Our open, transparent marketplace and powerful
   enterprise technology enable marketers to connect and engage consumers
   on thousands of high-quality websites and apps. The ads they buy fund
   award-winning journalism, music, video, and games-all at little or no
   cost to the consumers who enjoy open access to this premium content.
   Learn More

A premier marketplace for digital advertising

   [quality-icon-mobile.png]

Quality

   Roughly 90% of addressable comScore 200 digital publishers and all Ad
   Age 100 brands regularly sell and buy advertising in the AppNexus
   Marketplace.
   [safety-icon-mobile.png]

Safety

   We enforce strong prohibitions against domains and apps that traffic in
   hate speech, graphic violence, pornography, and fake news, and we’ve
   invested heavily in industry-leading anti-fraud technology.
   [cost-icon-mobile.png]

Cost Effectiveness

   The AppNexus Marketplace offers the industry’s most competitive pricing
   and provides a direct path between buyers and sellers, maximizing
   purchasing power for advertisers and monetization for publishers.
   [transparency-icon-mobile.png]

Transparency

   AppNexus brings transparency to the media supply chain so buyers and
   sellers understand exactly which impressions were bought and what
   technology fees were charged.

Enterprise Products for Buyers and Sellers of Digital Advertising

For Buyers

   Deliver better outcomes through our customizable DSP
   Get Started Buying

For Sellers

   Find a complete, transparent solution to manage your inventory
   Get Started Selling
   Created with Sketch.

Customer Success

   Ninety percent of comScore top 200 digital publishers and all AdAge top
   100 brands leverage AppNexus’ Marketplace.

   Join them.
   Scibids
   Read Case Study
   [slides-placeholder.png]
   Light Reaction
   Read Case Study
   [slides-placeholder.png]
   Greenhouse
   Read Case Study
   [slides-placeholder.png]
   Read all Case Studies

Find Your Perfect Solution

   Redirecting
   I am [_____________________]
   and I am looking for []
   Find Solutions

Footer

   Appnexus Logo

   28 W. 23rd Street
   New York, New York, 10010

Buy

   AppNexus Programmable Platform (DSP)

Sell

   AppNexus Adserver AppNexus SSP Audience Extension Yieldex Analytics

Marketplace

   Buy Sell

Insights

   Blog Hub Customer Success Thought Leadership Documentation Center

Company

   About Diversity and Inclusion Social Impact Leadership Press Locations
   Events
   See More

Careers

   Life at AppNexus Teams Getting Hired Tech Hub Students Open Roles
     * Copyright © 2019 AppNexus, A Xandr Company. All Rights Reserved.
     * Terms of Use
     * Trademarks Worldwide
     * Corporate Privacy Policy
     * Consumer Privacy
     * Candidate Privacy Policy
     * Opt Out
     * Copyright © 2019 AppNexus, A Xandr Company. All Rights Reserved.

     *
     *
     *
     *

   BACK TO TOP

   AppNexus and our partners use technology such as cookies on our site to
   personalize content, provide social media features, and analyze our
   traffic. Click below to consent to the use of this technology by
   AppNexus and these 3rd parties across the web. You can change your mind
   and revisit your consent choices at any time by returning to this site.
   GOT IT! Learn more
   #alternate

   Skip to main content

   (BUTTON)

Quick Links

     * (BUTTON) Careers

        Careers

        Life at AppNexus

        Teams

        Getting Hired

        Students

        Open Roles

     * (BUTTON) Log In

        Log In

        AppNexus Console

        Open AdStream (Europe)

        Open AdStream (North America-17)

        Open AdStream (North America-18)

   [en]
   (BUTTON) ×
   Search _______________
   Search

Main navigation

     * (BUTTON) Products

        Products

                Powerful enterprise technology for buyers and sellers

        Buy

                Programmatically buy media that delivers better outcomes

              AppNexus Programmable Platform

                      Deliver better outcomes through our customizable DSP

        Sell

                Get the most from every impression

              AppNexus Adserver

                      Serve your ads efficiently and transparently

              AppNexus SSP

                      Manage your programmatic demand in all formats and
                      channels

              Yieldex Analytics

                      Get a complete picture of your data and inventory

              Audience Extension

                      Understand your audience better than anyone else

     * (BUTTON) Marketplace

        Marketplace

                World’s leading destination for quality, efficient and
                brand-safe digital advertising

        Buy

                Buy in the largest independent marketplace

        Sell

                Sell in the largest independent marketplace

     * (BUTTON) Insights

        Insights

                Check out our white papers, case studies, and data-driven
                ad tech insights

        Blog Hub

                Our corporate, product, and tech blogs

        Customer Success

                Case studies on customer success

        Whitepapers

                Reports on digital advertising trends and best practices

   Contact
   Search _______________
   Search
   Cancel

Main navigation

     * Products
          + Buy

              AppNexus Programmable Platform

          + Sell

              AppNexus Adserver
              AppNexus SSP
              Yieldex Analytics
              Audience Extension

     * Marketplace
          + Buy
          + Sell
     * Insights
          + Blog Hub
          + Customer Success
          + Whitepapers

Quick Links

     * Careers
          + Life at AppNexus
          + Teams
          + Getting Hired
          + Students
          + Open Roles
     * Log In
          + AppNexus Console
          + Open AdStream (Europe)
          + Open AdStream (North America-17)
          + Open AdStream (North America-18)

   Change Region
   [en]
   Search
   Contact

   [seg?add=3359827&amp;t=2]

AppNexus Powers The Advertising That Powers The Internet

   Our mission is to create a better internet, and for us, that begins
   with advertising. Our open, transparent marketplace and powerful
   enterprise technology enable marketers to connect and engage consumers
   on thousands of high-quality websites and apps. The ads they buy fund
   award-winning journalism, music, video, and games-all at little or no
   cost to the consumers who enjoy open access to this premium content.
   Learn More

A premier marketplace for digital advertising

   [quality-icon-mobile.png]

Quality

   Roughly 90% of addressable comScore 200 digital publishers and all Ad
   Age 100 brands regularly sell and buy advertising in the AppNexus
   Marketplace.
   [safety-icon-mobile.png]

Safety

   We enforce strong prohibitions against domains and apps that traffic in
   hate speech, graphic violence, pornography, and fake news, and we’ve
   invested heavily in industry-leading anti-fraud technology.
   [cost-icon-mobile.png]

Cost Effectiveness

   The AppNexus Marketplace offers the industry’s most competitive pricing
   and provides a direct path between buyers and sellers, maximizing
   purchasing power for advertisers and monetization for publishers.
   [transparency-icon-mobile.png]

Transparency

   AppNexus brings transparency to the media supply chain so buyers and
   sellers understand exactly which impressions were bought and what
   technology fees were charged.

Enterprise Products for Buyers and Sellers of Digital Advertising

For Buyers

   Deliver better outcomes through our customizable DSP
   Get Started Buying

For Sellers

   Find a complete, transparent solution to manage your inventory
   Get Started Selling
   Created with Sketch.

Customer Success

   Ninety percent of comScore top 200 digital publishers and all AdAge top
   100 brands leverage AppNexus’ Marketplace.

   Join them.
   Scibids
   Read Case Study
   [slides-placeholder.png]
   Light Reaction
   Read Case Study
   [slides-placeholder.png]
   Greenhouse
   Read Case Study
   [slides-placeholder.png]
   Read all Case Studies

Find Your Perfect Solution

   Redirecting
   I am [_____________________]
   and I am looking for []
   Find Solutions

Footer

   Appnexus Logo

   28 W. 23rd Street
   New York, New York, 10010

Buy

   AppNexus Programmable Platform (DSP)

Sell

   AppNexus Adserver AppNexus SSP Audience Extension Yieldex Analytics

Marketplace

   Buy Sell

Insights

   Blog Hub Customer Success Thought Leadership Documentation Center

Company

   About Diversity and Inclusion Social Impact Leadership Press Locations
   Events
   See More

Careers

   Life at AppNexus Teams Getting Hired Tech Hub Students Open Roles
     * Copyright © 2019 AppNexus, A Xandr Company. All Rights Reserved.
     * Terms of Use
     * Trademarks Worldwide
     * Corporate Privacy Policy
     * Consumer Privacy
     * Candidate Privacy Policy
     * Opt Out
     * Copyright © 2019 AppNexus, A Xandr Company. All Rights Reserved.

     *
     *
     *
     *

   BACK TO TOP

   AppNexus and our partners use technology such as cookies on our site to
   personalize content, provide social media features, and analyze our
   traffic. Click below to consent to the use of this technology by
   AppNexus and these 3rd parties across the web. You can change your mind
   and revisit your consent choices at any time by returning to this site.
   GOT IT! Learn more
   #alternate alternate alternate

   Skip to main content

   (BUTTON)

Quick Links

     * (BUTTON) Careers

        Careers

        Life at AppNexus

        Teams

        Getting Hired

        Students

        Open Roles

     * (BUTTON) Log In

        Log In

        AppNexus Console

        Open AdStream (Europe)

        Open AdStream (North America-17)

        Open AdStream (North America-18)

   [en]
   (BUTTON) ×
   Search _______________
   Search

Main navigation

     * (BUTTON) Products

        Products

                Powerful enterprise technology for buyers and sellers

        Buy

                Programmatically buy media that delivers better outcomes

              AppNexus Programmable Platform

                      Deliver better outcomes through our customizable DSP

        Sell

                Get the most from every impression

              AppNexus Adserver

                      Serve your ads efficiently and transparently

              AppNexus SSP

                      Manage your programmatic demand in all formats and
                      channels

              Yieldex Analytics

                      Get a complete picture of your data and inventory

              Audience Extension

                      Understand your audience better than anyone else

     * (BUTTON) Marketplace

        Marketplace

                World’s leading destination for quality, efficient and
                brand-safe digital advertising

        Buy

                Buy in the largest independent marketplace

        Sell

                Sell in the largest independent marketplace

     * (BUTTON) Insights

        Insights

                Check out our white papers, case studies, and data-driven
                ad tech insights

        Blog Hub

                Our corporate, product, and tech blogs

        Customer Success

                Case studies on customer success

        Whitepapers

                Reports on digital advertising trends and best practices

   Contact
   Search _______________
   Search
   Cancel

Main navigation

     * Products
          + Buy

              AppNexus Programmable Platform

          + Sell

              AppNexus Adserver
              AppNexus SSP
              Yieldex Analytics
              Audience Extension

     * Marketplace
          + Buy
          + Sell
     * Insights
          + Blog Hub
          + Customer Success
          + Whitepapers

Quick Links

     * Careers
          + Life at AppNexus
          + Teams
          + Getting Hired
          + Students
          + Open Roles
     * Log In
          + AppNexus Console
          + Open AdStream (Europe)
          + Open AdStream (North America-17)
          + Open AdStream (North America-18)

   Change Region
   [en]
   Search
   Contact

AppNexus Platform Privacy Policy

   []

   Datenschutzerklärung

   Déclaration de Confidentialité

   AppNexus Inc. is a New York-headquartered advertising technology
   company. When our technology is used by companies running websites,
   apps and other internet-connected properties, it helps those companies
   generate revenue by assisting them in showing advertisements to their
   users. When our technology is used by marketers and other advertisers,
   it helps them show advertisements to individuals online who may be
   interested in their products or services.

   If you are interested in learning about how we collect, use, and
   disclose information through our digital advertising technology
   Platform, you have come to the right place.

   If you are interested in learning how we collect, use, and disclose
   information through other corporate activities, such as on our
   corporate website, AppNexus.com, please click here.

   To go directly to our opt out, click here.

What is in this document?

   This document provides information about our digital advertising
   technology services and then describes how we collect, use, share and
   otherwise process information.

   Our goal is to be transparent about our business by describing our
   technology and services in simple terms so that you can understand our
   practices.

   We know this is complicated, so if you have any questions about this
   information, please contact us here.

   We also created an Online Advertising and Ad Tech Glossary if you want
   to learn more about our technology, our services and more generally
   about the advertising technology ecosystem.

   You'll find the following information in this document:
    1. Background Information
          + What is the AppNexus Platform?
          + What do we mean by Platform Data?
          + For EEA Internet Users, the meaning of "Personal Data" under
            the General Data Protection Regulation and what this means for
            Platform Data
          + Glossary of Basic Terms
          + Cookie use by the Platform
    2. The AppNexus Platform Privacy Statement:
          + Overview
          + What information does AppNexus collect and use?
          + What information do our clients, partners and vendors collect
            and use?
          + How do we collect information?
          + How do we use the information we collect?
          + Legal basis for processing Personal Data (EEA Internet users
            only)
          + How and why do we share the information we collect?
          + How is information stored and how long is it kept?
          + What are your choices?
               o IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework
               o Opt Out
          + What are your personal data rights?
               o European Data Subject Rights
               o Privacy Shield related rights
          + Industry Self-Regulation
          + Data Transfers for Internet Users in the EEA and the EU-US and
            Swiss-US Privacy Shield Framework
          + Contact Us
          + What are your personal data rights?
               o DPO
               o Data Controller

What is the AppNexus Platform (or the "Platform")?

   AppNexus is not an ad network or a data broker. AppNexus is a digital
   advertising technology platform. We do not own digital properties on
   which we advertise and we partake in advertising in a limited manner
   for our own recruiting purposes and to advertise to other businesses
   (not to consumers). By "Platform," we mean we provide technology that
   websites, mobile apps and publishers of other internet-connected
   properties (such as internet-connected TV's), our sellers, use to sell
   ad space on their websites, mobile apps and other digital media
   properties (which we collectively refer to as "Digital Properties") and
   that advertisers or companies on the advertiser's behalf, our buyers,
   use to purchase that ad space in the most efficient way possible.
   Sellers want their ads to be relevant to their readers, which helps
   them to offer content for no cost or lower cost. Buyers want to use
   their advertising dollars efficiently by reaching the right audiences,
   and by measuring the effectiveness of their ads. To accomplish these
   goals, buyers and sellers and their partners use our Platform to engage
   in a variety of techniques, including interest-based advertising,
   real-time (or programmatic) advertising, contextual, and location-based
   advertising.

   The Platform also provides buyers and sellers other tools, like the
   ability to measure the effectiveness of their ads, to help prevent
   malware or other bad activity, and similar functions designed to make
   the buying and selling of ad space seamless, efficient, and effective.

   Buyers, sellers, and other companies may also use our Platform to buy
   and sell data to help make the ads that end users see more relevant.

What do we mean by Platform Data?

   The Platform is designed to use certain types of information, that all
   together we call Platform Data, which includes:
     * Information sent to or uploaded to our Platform by our clients and
       partners which may include information about you, such as IP
       address, unique device identifiers, and the latitude and longitude
       of your device when you view a website that wants to show you an ad
     * Information sent to or uploaded to our Platform by our clients and
       partners that ties unique device identifier(s) to perceived
       interests and behavior (e.g., women, ages 40-59), which may include
       information about you

   See "What Information we collect and use" for more details on the type
   of information we include in Platform Data.

   Some of this information (including for example IP addresses and
   certain unique device identifiers), may identify a particular computer
   or device, and may be considered "Personal Data" in some jurisdictions,
   including the European Union (see below on the meaning of "Personal
   Data"). This data allows us to recognize a particular computer or
   device over time.

   We do not allow information that by itself identifies an individual in
   the "real world", such as name, address, phone number, email address,
   or government identifier, to be used on the Platform. We also do not
   allow information that directly identifies an individual to be
   collected or used in connection with use of our Platform.

For EEA Internet Users, the meaning of "Personal Data" under the General Data
Protection Regulation ("GDPR"), and what this means for Platform Data

   "Personal Data" is defined as any data relating to a living individual
   who can be identified directly from that data, or indirectly in
   conjunction with other information. It can take the form of a name or
   address, and can extend to unique identifiers, IP addresses and other
   identifiers which do not tell us who an Internet user is in the "real
   world" but may, when combined with other information, allow the
   identification of a living individual.

   We do not collect personal data that identifies you as an individual in
   the "real world." When you (an Internet user) visit a Digital Property
   that has integrated our technology or that uses technology that
   integrates with our Platform, we do not know your name or email address
   or other information that directly identifies you. We take care to
   ensure that we do not collect any information that tells us who you
   are.

   Instead, when you first visit a Digital Property that has integrated
   our technology, this triggers a request to our Platform to fill ad
   space or measure information about an ad shown to you. When this
   occurs, we assign a random unique identifier (a Digital Identifier) an
   "AppNexus ID," to your browser or device, which allows the Platform to
   automatically recognize your browser or device the next time it visits
   another Digital Property that has integrated our technology. This type
   of "pseudonymous data" is defined as "Personal Data" under the GDPR.

   This allows our clients and certain third party provider to sync their
   own Digital Identifiers against this AppNexus ID (see ID Synching
   below) so that our clients and certain third party provider can use
   their own data on the Platform that they may have associated with their
   own Digital Identifiers.

   We use Platform Data both as an independent controller and as a data
   processor.

Glossary of basic terms

   Ad Server: An ad server, in its simplest form, is the computer
   responsible for delivering an ad to be shown in a web page or a mobile
   app. Today, communications may be sent to several servers in the
   process of selecting and delivering an ad. This occurs in a matter of
   milliseconds (thousandths of a second).

   Beacons, Pixels, Tags, and SDKs: Beacons (also sometimes referred to as
   web beacons or pixels) and tags are elements included in web pages to
   enable companies to collect data, serve advertising, and provide
   related services, such as measuring ad effectiveness or preventing fake
   ad traffic. They do this by allowing communication between a web
   browser and a server. A beacon is a small transparent image that is
   placed on a web page. A tag is a small piece of website code that is
   run by the web browser. An SDK is a piece of computer code that
   developers include in their mobile applications.

   Browser: A browser or web browser is the user interface or application
   through which you view Digital Properties. Examples of prominent
   browsers are Microsoft's Internet Explorer, Google's Chrome, Apple's
   Safari, and Mozilla's Firefox.

   Cookie: A cookie is a small text file that is stored in a web browser
   by a website or Ad Server. By saving information in a cookie, websites
   and servers can remember preferences or recognize web browsers from one
   visit to another or from one website to another.

   Cross-Device Mapping: Cross-device mapping is the process of making
   inferences that certain devices are related to each other, i.e. they
   belong to the same user or household. This is done using either
   "statistical" or "deterministic" methods (or a combination).
   "Statistical" refers to using mathematical techniques to make
   intelligent guesses that certain devices are related. "Deterministic"
   means using known relationships, for example logins that use the same
   email address or other personal information, to link multiple devices
   to a single user. When this method is used companies typically mask the
   actual email address.

   Device Identifiers: Cookies, Mobile Advertising Identifiers or other
   identifiers that do not identify an individual but identify a specific
   device.

   ID Synching: ID synching (sometimes also referred to as cookie syncing)
   is a common and long-standing process in the digital advertising
   industry. It enables advertisers to link up data from multiple
   advertising platforms. (In other words, it helps advertisers buy ads in
   more than one place.)

   Here's an example of how it works. Let's say you sell a product on your
   website. A customer visits your site. Your website stores a cookie to
   identify that customer's browser, and the cookie contains an ID of
   12345. You then associate that ID with information about what the
   customer shopped for on your site.

   If you want to then use that information to advertise to that user, you
   might go to an online advertising marketplace to buy ad space. In order
   to buy the right ad space to show your ads to the right user, you'll
   need to match your ID, which is 12345 to the ID that the marketplace
   has assigned to the same customer (which let's say for this example is
   ABCDE).

   The result is a record that says ID 12345 = Marketplace ID ABCDE. That
   way, when the marketplace offers to sell you ad space to show you're ad
   to to ABCDE, your system will know that ABCDE is the same as 12345, and
   you can pick the right ad to show the customer.

   Interest-Based Advertising: Interest-based advertising uses information
   collected across multiple web sites or mobile apps to predict users'
   preferences and to show ads that are most likely to be of interest to
   them. For example, if a user visits a travel site or uses a travel app,
   she might see travel-related ads on another site or app and the ads may
   be about the destinations or kinds of trip the user has looked at.
   Advertisers may also use other information they have or can acquire
   about users' interests and demographic information like age group and
   approximately where a user lives. Users have choices with respect to
   this type of advertising, as discussed below.

   Mobile Advertising Identifiers: Mobile advertising IDs (e.g., Apple's
   iOs Identifier for Advertising (IDFA) or Google's Android Advertising
   ID (AAID)) are unique IDs that are similar to cookies, but instead of
   being stored on your web browser, they are associated with individual
   mobile devices.Mobile Advertising Identifiers do not reveal a user's
   real world identity. They usually are user-resettable. Mobile
   Advertising Identifiers are used in connection with apps on your mobile
   device as opposed to websites that you access through a browser.

   Non-Cookie Technology: Companies sometimes use alternative methods that
   perform functions similar to cookies in order to identify unique
   browsers or devices. For example, some platforms, such as Apple's iOS
   and Google's Play Services for Android, provide unique IDs to be used
   for advertising. Additionally, mathematical or statistical techniques
   are sometimes used to try to identify devices. These "Statistical
   Identifiers" are not 100% accurate.

   Precise Geographic Location: Your device may be capable of sharing your
   precise geographic location with the apps or web pages you visit using
   that device. Devices use one or more methods to determine your
   location, including GPS coordinates and information about wifi networks
   in your vicinity. (Geographic location determined from IP address is
   typically not considered to be "precise.") Devices such as iPhone or
   Android phones typically ask for users' consent before installing or
   using an app that accesses the device's precise geographic location.
   The app, in turn, may make this information available to third-party
   advertising companies in order to make the ads you see more relevant.

   Real-Time Transactions (Also called Real-Time Bidding, Real-Time
   Advertising or Programmatic Advertising): Advertising buyers are able
   to bid in "real time" for the opportunity to show an online
   advertisement when a web page is loaded or an app is used. The winning
   bidder gets to show its ad.

   Of course, the explanations above are simplified. There are many
   resources available on the web to learn more about these concepts and
   online advertising in general. Although we have no responsibility for
   the content of these sites, we offer the following as good places to
   learn more:
     * OnGuardOnline.gov: onguardonline.gov
     * All About Cookies: www.allaboutcookies.org
     * Wikipedia: en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Online_advertising
     * AboutAds.info, For Consumers page: www.aboutads.info/consumers
     * The Network Advertising Initiativ:
       networkadvertising.org/managing/learn_more.asp
     * In the EU: www.youronlinechoices.com
     * About web browser cookie settings: - Internet Explorer:
       http://windows.microsoft.com/en-US/internet-explorer/delete-manage-
       cookies#ie=ie-11 - Firefox: support.mozilla.com/en-US/kb/Cookies -
       Chrome: www.google.com/support/chrome - Safari:
       http://support.apple.com/kb/PH19214?viewlocale=en_US&locale=en_US

Cookie use by the Platform

   Although the specific cookies employed on the AppNexus Platform may
   change from time to time, this describes how and why the AppNexus
   Platform uses cookies. These cookies enable our clients to target ads
   to users, to evaluate how well their ads work, and to see users'
   opt-out choices. For a detailed description of cookies set by the
   Platform, see AppNexus Cookies.
     * The Platform uses unique cookies to distinguish between unique web
       browsers, and to store data for advertising purposes, including
       interest-based advertising.
     * The Platform uses unique cookies to store ad delivery and reporting
       data for clients, such as, for example, which ad was shown, the
       number of times a particular ad has been shown, and how recently an
       ad was shown to a particular web browser.
     * The Platform uses unique cookies to enable ad buyers to track
       users' responses (i.e. whether a user clicked on an ad, visited a
       website or bought something after seeing an ad) to ads purchased on
       the platform.
     * The Platform uses cookies with non-unique values for server
       load-balancing and similar technical purposes.
     * The Platform uses non-unique cookies to store users' opt-out
       choices.
     * The Platform may also use some Non-Cookie Technologies for these
       purposes (as defined above and as detailed below).
     * Cookies play a role in Cross-Device linking in that cookies from
       different browsers or devices might be associated with each other.
     * Some browsers or other software may be configured to block 3rd
       party cookies by default.

THE APPNEXUS PLATFORM PRIVACY STATEMENT

   Last Modified: 05/24/2018 (view archived versions)

   Overview
   This privacy statement describes how AppNexus collects, uses, shares or
   otherwise processes Platform Data. It may describe how AppNexus enables
   or allows clients and third-party providers to use Platform Data, but
   otherwise does not apply to our clients' or other third parties'
   practices.

   Companies using the Platform own their own data, and AppNexus retains
   limited rights to use Platform Data to run the Platform and provide and
   improve our advertising technology services. That's part of what makes
   it a Platform.

   What information do we collect and use?

   The Platform is designed to collect and use only Platform Data as
   described in this document. Details.

   How do we collect information?

   The Platform uses Cookies, Beacons, Pixels, Tags, mobile SDKs, and some
   Non-Cookie technologies to collect and store Platform Data about web
   browsers and devices across web sites and apps and over time. Details.

   For what purposes do we use the collected information?

   AppNexus uses the information collected on the Platform to provide,
   operate, manage, maintain, and enhance the Platform and allow our
   clients to use our Platform. This means facilitating: serving of ads,
   including interest-based advertising by our clients and partners;
   facilitating serving of ads based on Precise Geographic Location
   information; reporting on ad delivery and conversions; providing
   frequency capping and recency measurement; using information for fraud
   detection and the prevention and detection of malicious behavior and
   maintaining and enhancing our services including using information for
   machine learning, optimization and statistical analysis. Details.

   On what legal basis do we process Personal Data

   Where you are located in the European Economic Area (the "EEA") and
   where AppNexus is a controller of personal data, AppNexus' legal basis
   for collecting and using the personal data described below depends on
   the data concerned and the specific context in which we collect or use
   it. We normally rely on our legitimate interests to collect and use
   personal data, except where our interests are overridden by your data
   protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. Our legitimate
   interests are described in more detail below (see "How do we use the
   information we collect") and include the operation of our Platform and
   business and the provision of our online advertising technology
   services to our clients as required by our agreements with them. In
   some cases, we may rely on your consent which is obtained for us by the
   operator of the Digital Properties that use our technology or use
   technology that interacts with our Platform. Additionally, we may have
   a legal obligation to collect personal data. Details.

   What information do we share with third parties?

   Where permitted, we provide clients and third-party providers access to
   their Platform Data that they collect, acquire, or use on the Platform,
   and typically they may remove it from the Platform for their own use.
   For a current list of third party providers who may, subject to our
   clients' permission, receive your data, see here. AppNexus may also
   provide Platform Data to our partners and service providers for the
   purpose of operating, managing, maintaining, or enhancing our services,
   including for the safety and security of the Platform and the online
   industry, or as required by law. AppNexus does not share the
   information collected on the Platform with other third parties, unless
   legally required. Details.

   How is the information stored and how long is it kept?

   Platform Data is stored using generally accepted security standards. It
   is usually aggregated or deleted within 3-60 days, but may be retained
   in the Platform for up to 18 months from the date of collection before
   aggregation or deletion. Details.

   What are your choices?

   For EEA users, we are registered as a vendor with, and support, the IAB
   Europe Transparency and Consent Framework (the "Industry Framework").
   As a Platform, various clients and third party providers using our
   Platform may be accessing your device or collecting, using and sharing
   your personal data as independent controllers for different uses and
   based on different legal bases or as processors on behalf of other
   independent controllers. When you visit a Digital Property, the
   Industry Framework is designed to allow Digital Properties the means to
   choose which third parties they wish to allow to access your device and
   collect, use and share your personal data and provide dynamic
   transparency and choice to you about each of these third parties
   (either an opportunity for you to consent or opt out) in connection
   with your visit to the Digital Property, depending on that
   third-party's use of your personal data and legal basis.

   Web browser users may opt out of the use of the Platform for
   interest-based advertising in their web browser. Mobile app users have
   access to choices provided by certain apps or in their device system
   software. Details.

   What happens if this privacy statement is changed?

   Check this policy for changes. The date of the last update can be found
   at the top of this Policy. Material changes will not be applied to
   previously collected Platform Data. Details.

   Questions?

   Send a message here.

What Information Do We Collect and Use?

   Platform Data

   When you visit a Digital Property (i.e. a site) that uses our
   technology (or that uses technology that transacts with parties using
   our Platform) we collect or receive certain information about you and
   your device including:
     * Information about your browser including:
          + the type of browser
          + browser language
          + browser settings
          + cookie information

     * Information about your device including:
          + information about the device's operating system including its
            version and connection type
          + device make, device model
          + Device Identifiers such as your IDFA or AAID
          + Precise Geographic Location data when location services have
            been enabled for an app on your device that has integrated our
            technology or that sends that information to our Platform
          + the IP address from which the device accesses a client's
            Digital Property

     * Information about your activity on a Digital Property including web
       pages or apps visited or used and the time those web pages or apps
       were visited or used. Note this information is only collected and
       received by us in connection with requests to us initiated by
       Digital Properties using our technology to show ads to you or to
       track your activity in connection with the delivery of an ad or to
       place Digital Identifiers associated with your browser or device
       into interest-based segments. This means we do not passively track
       your activity but only receive information about your activity in
       connection with requests specifically made to our Platform to serve
       you an ad, measure your interaction with an ad or to place you into
       an interest-based category for future use by a client to help make
       the ads they show to you more relevant.

     * Information about ads served, viewed or clicked on, including the
       type of ad, where the ad was served, whether you clicked on it and
       whether you visited the advertiser's website or downloaded the
       advertiser's app.

     * Information about you or inferences about your interests that a
       seller, buyer or third-party provider has collected about you and
       shared with us such as information about your interests or
       demographic information (your age or gender) or to help make the
       ads served to you more relevant. For clarity, we do not
       independently collect information about your interests or
       demographic information for use within our Platform, but we do
       allow our clients and third party providerss to utilize their own
       data or third-party data they have access to in connection with the
       Services.

     * Information about your Internet service including information about
       which Internet Service Provider (ISP) is used by you.

   Data from Third-Party Sources

   The Platform allows clients to use information about you such as
   demographic information (e.g. your age or gender) or information about
   your interests provided by third-party sources such as third-party data
   providers and our clients' data management platforms in order to show
   more relevant ads to you.

   Clients, data providers and data management platforms may use ID
   Synching to enable the use of this information through the Platform.

Information Our Clients, our Vendors and our Clients Third Party Providers
Collect

   Our clients, our vendors, and our clients' third party providers, who
   use our technology, may use their own tags, pixels, cookies, or other
   similar technology (or those of their other affiliates) within their
   advertisements and on certain Digital Properties. We are not
   responsible for our clients, vendors and/or our clients' third party
   providers. use of such tracking technologies or for their privacy
   practices.

How Do We Collect Information?

     * The Platform uses Cookies, Beacons, Pixels, Tags, mobile SDKs, and
       in some cases Non-Cookie technologies, to collect data associated
       with particular web browsers or devices
     * The Platforms also receives data from Clients and Third-Party
       Sources (as set out above)

How do we use the information we collect?

     * For our legitimate business interests to provide services to our
       clients, including:
          + Providing and Operating our Services which includes:
          + Compiling statistics about the advertising transactions
            occurring through our Platform and conducting research and
            development for our own internal business purposes, such as
            analyzing campaign forecasting including conducting machine
            learning to better help our clients' sale of ad space and our
            clients' delivery of ads to you
          + Analyzing and reporting on campaign and ad performance (such
            as reporting to buyers about when and how you have been
            exposed to ads or clicked on ads and reporting to sellers
            information about when and how ads were shown on their Digital
            Properties and whether they were clicked on)
          + Investigating, protecting against and deterring malicious
            activity, fake traffic or fraudulent, unauthorized or illegal
            activity on the Platform and on the internet
     * Hands on Help: The Platform enables AppNexus' clients to collect,
       buy, and sell data and to use Platform Data to buy and sell online
       advertising. Sometime AppNexus staff give "hands-on" help to
       clients using the Platform for these purposes, for example by
       configuring advertising campaigns for clients to best meet their
       objectives.
     * Allowing our Clients to use Platform Data for the following
       advertising-related purposes:
          + Interested Based Advertising: Using Platform Data to infer
            what you may be interested in and to serve ads to you based on
            these inferred interests. Our clients may use their Platform
            Data to create interest profiles about you but AppNexus does
            not create or use interest profiles about you for use by us or
            across our clients. Any interest profile used on our Platform
            is created by or for a client to be used by that client or by
            another client or clients (as permissioned by the client that
            created the interest profile).
          + Frequency Capping: Limiting the number of times you see an ad
            so you don't see the same ad or type of ad too many times
          + Showing ads in a particular sequence: Showing you ads in a
            particular order to provide a better user experience
          + Geo-Targeting: Customizing ads shown to you based on your
            current or prior location
          + Contextual Ads: Showing ads to you based on the content you
            are viewing
          + Ad Measurement: Understanding how users respond to ads (e.g.,
            clicking on the ad)
          + Aggregated Statistics: Reporting aggregated statistics
            regarding, for example, the effectiveness of online
            advertising campaigns
          + Cross-Device Mapping: Enabling Cross-Device Mapping in order
            to serve or measure advertising on related devices on behalf
            of our clients.

   Typically, companies using the AppNexus Platform own the information
   that they provide to and get from the Platform. While we take care to
   obtain assurances from our clients and partners that their use of
   information collected through the use of our technology will comply
   with applicable laws, when clients remove their information from the
   Platform, their use of that information is governed by their own
   privacy policies and applicable laws, rules, or regulations.

Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data (EEA Internet users only)

   If you are located in the EEA, where we are the controller of personal
   data, our legal basis for processing the personal data described above
   under "What Information do we Collect and Use" will depend on the data
   concerned and the specific context in which we collect or use it.

   However, we normally rely on our legitimate interest to collect
   personal data, except where such interests are overridden by an
   Internet user's data protection interests or fundamental rights and
   freedoms. Our legitimate interests are the operation of our platform
   and business and the provision of online advertising services to our
   clients as required by our agreements with them. In some cases, we may
   rely on the user's consent obtained by the operator of the Digital
   Properties that use our technology or have a legal obligation to
   collect User Information, or use Platform Data, or may otherwise need
   the Platform Data. Where we rely on our legitimate interests to process
   an Internet User's User Information, they include the interests
   described in the section titled "How do we use the information we
   collect?"

   In some cases, we may rely on our consent which Digital Properties
   using our technology obtain from you. We may also have a legal
   obligation to collect personal data from you. If we rely on consent to
   process your data, we will obtain such consent in compliance with
   applicable laws.

   If you have questions about or need further information concerning the
   legal basis on which we process personal data, please contact us here.

How and why do we share the information we collect?

   AppNexus shares Platform Data with third parties in the following
   cases:
     * Clients and third party vendors
          + When you visit a Digital Property (i.e. a site) and that
            Digital Property wants to show you ads, in order to show you
            those ads, the Digital Property must let certain third parties
            access your device or receive and use the information noted
            above under "What Information do we collect and use."
          + Depending on how those third parties collect and use that
            information, those parties may be:
               o independently making decisions about how your data is
                 used in different ways, for different reasons based on
                 different legal bases
               o using your data strictly at the instruction of another
                 party solely on behalf of that party
          + As such, at the instruction of our clients, we share
            information with clients and third party vendors:
               o so that they can decide whether to bid on ad inventory or
                 serve an advertisement and choose the best ad for you
                 using their data and our and our partners' technology
                 (and measure and report on those ads after they're
                 delivered)
               o so that certain of them can create demographic and
                 interest profiles to help our clients choose the best ad
                 for you using our and our partners' technology
               o so that they can improve their products and services for
                 use by us and others across the broader online
                 advertising ecosystem (e.g. your Device Identifier may be
                 used to improve fraud detection services)
          + When our clients integrate our technology in order to show you
            ads and enable us to collect your data, other than for the
            reasons noted below, we do not decide which third parties may
            receive your information.
          + For users located within the EEA, we provide our clients with
            various controls to choose the third parties with whom we
            share your information that we collect through each client's
            use of our Platform including:
               o IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework:
                    # We are registered as a vendor with, and support, the
                      IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework (the
                      "Industry Framework")
                    # When you visit a Digital Property, the Industry
                      Framework is designed to allow a Digital Property to
                      choose which third parties (vendors) they wish to
                      allow to access your device and use your personal
                      data and provide dynamic transparency and choice to
                      you about each of these vendors (either an
                      opportunity for you to consent or opt out) in
                      connection with your visit to the Digital Property,
                      depending on that third-party's use of your data and
                      legal basis.
               o Information about third parties operating through our
                 Platform and Platform Controls:
                    # Information about third parties operating through
                      our Platform for disclosure purposes and
                      whitelisting capabilities - essentially creating
                      lists of approved companies - to control which third
                      parties may receive and use your information
          + For users located outside of the EEA, we provide our clients
            with Platform Controls, including our whitelisting
            capabilities, to control which third parties may receive your
            information.
     * Service Providers (including data centers, hosting providers,
       anti-fraud, technology and security providers): We share with
       Service Providers (or enable their collection of) Platform Data so
       that they can perform functions and provide services to us
       including for purposes of protecting the safety and security of the
       online ecosystem, including to detect and prevent malicious
       activity or fake traffic. Our Service Providers are subject to
       obligations consistent with this Privacy Policy and appropriate
       confidentiality and security measures.
     * Legal Rights and Compliance with Law: We may also disclose Platform
       Data in the event that we reasonably suspect malicious activity or
       fake traffic or when we reasonably believe it is required by law,
       subpoena or other legal process, including to meet national
       security or law enforcement requirements.
     * AppNexus Affiliates: We share Platform Data with other companies in
       the AppNexus group of companies to use for any of the purposes
       described in this Privacy Policy.
     * Business Transfers: We may transfer Platform Data to a successor
       entity in connection with a corporate merger, consolidation, sale
       of assets, bankruptcy, or other corporate change.
     * Aggregated Data: We may also share aggregated data derived from the
       Platform, including, for example, statistics about Platform
       activity.

How is Platform Data Stored and How Long is it Kept?

   Security
     * AppNexus uses generally accepted industry security standards to
       protect information transmitted over or stored on the Platform.
     * We review our information collection, storage and processing
       practices, including physical security measures, to guard against
       unauthorized access to systems.
     * We restrict access to information to employees, contractors and
       agents who need the information in order to process it for us, and
       who are subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations
       and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these
       obligations.
     * Please note, however, that no transmission or storage of
       information can ever be guaranteed to be completely secure. Once we
       receive Platform Data, we will use strict procedures and security
       features to try to prevent unauthorized access. Please also be
       mindful that we are not responsible for the security measures of
       third parties.

   Retention
     * We never store any information longer than we need it. Platform
       Data is usually aggregated or deleted within 3-60 days, but may be
       retained in the Platform for up to 18 months for specific clients
       and for use for security and the detection and prevention of fraud
       and invalid traffic from the date of collection before aggregation
       or deletion. When we no longer need the information we collect, it
       is deleted or aggregated.
     * Aggregated information is used for reporting and analysis, and may
       be stored in the Platform for up to 2 additional years.
     * When third party vendors receive information through us or clients
       remove their information from the Platform, their storage and
       retention of the removed information is governed by their own
       privacy policies and applicable laws, rules, or regulations.

What are your choices?

   IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework: If you are located in
   the EEA and visiting a Digital Property, we are registered as a vendor
   with, support and encourage our clients to use the IAB Europe
   Transparency and Consent Framework (the "Industry Framework") to
   provide you with dynamic transparency into and choice about the various
   third parties our clients use to serve you ads, including ourselves.
   When you visit a Digital Property, the Industry Framework is designed
   to allow a Digital Property the means to choose which vendors they wish
   to allow to access your device and process your personal data and
   provide dynamic transparency and choice to you about each of these
   vendors (either an opportunity for you to consent to the vendor or opt
   out of data processing by the vendor depending on that vendor's legal
   basis and use of your personal data).

   Opt Out of Interest-Based Advertising: You can opt out of
   interest-based advertising.

   AppNexus Web Browser Opt Out: You can click below to opt out of having
   the Platform used to select ads for your browser based on your online
   web browsing behavior. When you opt out, an opt out cookie (from
   adnxs.com) will be stored in your web browser. The Platform will know
   the choice you have made when it sees your opt out cookie, and will
   apply your choice to all companies' using the Platform. If you block or
   delete the opt out cookie, you will not be opted out and will need to
   allow cookies from AppNexus and renew your opt-out choice.

   []

   (BUTTON) Opt Out

   To review your opt-in status, please visit the Network Advertising
   Initiative opt-out page.

   Important things to note about the opt out:
     * Blocked cookies: The opt out cookie may not work if your browser is
       configured to block third-party cookies.
     * Deleting or protecting opt outs: If you delete your cookies, you
       will need to opt out again. There are browser plugins to help you
       preserve your opt out cookies. For more information, please visit
       https://www.aboutads.info/.
     * Only this browser: The opt out only applies to the browser profile
       in which you set it. For example, if you set the opt out while
       using Firefox, but then use Chrome, the opt out will not be active
       in Chrome. To opt out in Chrome, you will need to repeat the opt
       out process. This is because the cookies cannot be read between
       different browsers or browser profiles.
     * The opt out does not block or delete cookies: It also does not
       prevent the use of cookies or other technologies for purposes other
       than selecting ads based on your interests as inferred by your
       online behavior. If you opt out, data may still be collected about
       your web browsing activities and you will still see advertising.
       Ads may be selected, for example, based on the content of the web
       page in which they are shown. If you wish to block or delete
       cookies altogether, you can use web browser settings to do so.
     * Learn More: To learn more about interest-based advertising, and to
       access the opt outs of other online advertising companies, visit
       the Network Advertising Initiative opt out page.

   AppNexus Mobile App Opt Out: Mobile device system software such as
   Apple iOS or Google Play Services provide mechanisms that allow users
   to opt out of the use of information about their usage of mobile apps
   to deliver targeted ads to their mobile device. For more information,
   or to opt out using these mechanisms, consult your device settings
   ("Opt out of Interest-Based Ads" on Android devices and "Limit Ad
   Tracking" on iOS devices).

   Location: Most mobile devices offer you the ability to stop the
   collection of location information at any time by changing the
   preferences on your device. You may also be able to stop the collection
   of location information by particular apps by adjusting the settings
   for individual apps or following the standard uninstall process to
   remove specific mobile apps from your device. Note when location
   services have not been enabled in any of your apps, we will still infer
   data about your location based on your IP address.

What are your personal data access rights?

   We collect the minimum amount of personal data about you that is
   necessary to provide our Services. Because we do not collect and we
   prohibit clients and third party vendors from storing information that
   directly identifies an individual on the Platform, it is generally not
   feasible for us to provide individuals information that is tied to
   their identities.

European Data Subject Rights

   If you are a resident of a country in the EEA, you have certain rights
   and protections under the law regarding the collection, processing, and
   use of information about you. As stated above, the information we
   collect about you when you visit Digital Properties that use our
   advertising technology may include certain identifiers that are
   considered "Personal Data" under European law. We process this data as
   necessary to further the legitimate interests of our customers, who
   rely on the ability to deliver, to you and other users, advertisements
   (including targeted advertisements) in order to fund the online content
   they deliver to you.

   As a resident of a country in the EEA, you have the right to: (i) to
   request access and obtain a copy of your personal data, (ii) to request
   rectification or, in certain circumstances, and subject to some
   specific legal reasons where we may need to retain data, erasure; (iii)
   to restrict the processing of your personal data; and (iv) if
   applicable, to data portability. In certain circumstances, you may also
   have the right to object to the processing of your personal data.

   If you are interested in exercising any of these rights, please see our
   Data Subject Rights Policy.

   Finally, as a resident of the EEA, you have the right to lodge a
   complaint about our processing of personal data with a European Data
   Protection Authority in particular, the Member State of your residence,
   place of work or alleged infringement of the GDPR. For contact details
   of your relevant local Data Protection Authority, please see here.

Privacy Shield related rights

   If you believe that AppNexus holds information that would allow us to
   correct, amend or delete inaccurate information about you or that
   information about you has been processed in violation of the EU-US
   Privacy Shield's Principles, please contact us here.

   We will seek to provide access to such data, but will not be able to do
   so when the burden or expense of providing access would be
   disproportionate to the risks to the individual's privacy in the case
   in question, or where the rights of persons other than the individual
   would be violated.

Industry Self-Regulation

   AppNexus supports industry self-regulation, and endorses best practices
   and self-regulatory requirements that apply to the Platform. AppNexus
   is a member in good standing of the Network Advertising Initiative
   (NAI), and adheres to the NAI Code of Conduct for Web and Mobile.

   Additionally, the following industry sites provide useful information
   about industry self-regulation of interest-based advertising:
     * US: www.networkadvertising.org and www.aboutads.info
     * EU: www.youronlinechoices.com

Global Operations and Privacy Shield

   AppNexus is a global company headquartered in the United States with
   data centers located in the United States, Europe and Asia. If you
   access any of the Digital Properties that use our technology, please be
   aware that your information may be transferred to, stored and processed
   by us and our affiliates in our facilities in the United States and
   other countries (including in Singapore, Japan, Australia and Brazil
   where our global affiliates have offices) and by those third parties
   with whom we may share your information.

   These countries (including the United States) may not provide an
   adequate level of data protection for your information (as determined
   by the European Commission) or have data protection or other laws as
   comprehensive as those in your country. We will, however, ensure that
   where AppNexus group companies or third-party service providers receive
   information outside of the EEA, appropriate protections are in place
   under European data protection legislation (which includes either Model
   Clauses or Privacy Shield compliance).

   For example, in order to ensure that your information is adequately
   protected when transferred outside of the EEA, AppNexus has entered
   into inter-company "model clause" agreements and other adequacy
   arrangements with other various entities located outside the EEA with
   whom we share your information. A copy of such agreements is available
   on request.

   Additionally, if we transfer personal information from the European
   Union to the United States or Switzerland to the United States, we
   comply with the EU-US Privacy Shield Framework and the Swiss-US Privacy
   Shield Framework as set forth by the US Department of Commerce
   regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information
   transferred from the European Union and Switzerland to the United
   States, respectively. AppNexus has certified to the Department of
   Commerce that it adheres to the Privacy Shield Principles. To learn
   more about the Privacy Shield program, and to view our certification,
   please visit https://www.privacyshield.gov/.

   For any questions or complaints regarding our compliance with either
   the EU-US Privacy Shield Framework and the Swiss-US Privacy Shield
   Framework, please contact us here.

   If AppNexus does not resolve your complaint, you may submit your
   complaint free of charge to ICDR/AAA, AppNexus' designated independent
   dispute resolution provider. Under certain conditions specified by the
   principles of the EU-US and the Swiss-US Privacy Shield Frameworks,
   respectively, you may also be able to invoke binding arbitration to
   resolve your complaint. AppNexus is subject to the investigatory and
   enforcement powers of the FTC. If AppNexus shares the personal data of
   an individual located in the EU or Switzerland with a third-party
   service provider that processes the data solely on AppNexus' behalf,
   then AppNexus will be liable for that third-party's processing of that
   data in violation of the Principles, unless AppNexus can prove that it
   is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.

What Happens if this Privacy Statement is Changed?

   Check this page for changes. We may change this privacy statement at
   any time.

   If we make changes that, in our sole discretion, are material, those
   changes will not be applied to information collected prior to the date
   the changes went into effect.

Contact Us

   If you have questions about privacy on the AppNexus Platform, you can
   send us a message here.

   If you are located in the EEA, you can confidentially contact our Data
   Protection Officer here.

   You can also contact us by post using the details provided below:
   AppNexus Inc.
   Attn: Chief Privacy Counsel
   28 West 23rd Street
   Floor 4
   New York, NY 10010
   USA

   Important note:Where AppNexus is the data controller of EEA residents'
   personal data, the data controller is AppNexus Inc. As previously
   noted, the data controller of Platform Data will vary depending on how
   it is collected and by whom. At the point of collection, this
   information should be made available to you by or on behalf of any
   other data controller.

Footer

   Appnexus Logo

   28 W. 23rd Street
   New York, New York, 10010

Buy

   AppNexus Programmable Platform (DSP)

Sell

   AppNexus Adserver AppNexus SSP Audience Extension Yieldex Analytics

Marketplace

   Buy Sell

Insights

   Blog Hub Customer Success Thought Leadership Documentation Center

Company

   About Diversity and Inclusion Social Impact Leadership Press Locations
   Events
   See More

Careers

   Life at AppNexus Teams Getting Hired Tech Hub Students Open Roles
     * Copyright © 2019 AppNexus, A Xandr Company. All Rights Reserved.
     * Terms of Use
     * Trademarks Worldwide
     * Corporate Privacy Policy
     * Consumer Privacy
     * Candidate Privacy Policy
     * Opt Out
     * Copyright © 2019 AppNexus, A Xandr Company. All Rights Reserved.

     *
     *
     *
     *

   BACK TO TOP

   AppNexus and our partners use technology such as cookies on our site to
   personalize content, provide social media features, and analyze our
   traffic. Click below to consent to the use of this technology by
   AppNexus and these 3rd parties across the web. You can change your mind
   and revisit your consent choices at any time by returning to this site.
   GOT IT! Learn more
   #alternate

   Skip to main content

   (BUTTON)

Quick Links

     * (BUTTON) Careers

        Careers

        Life at AppNexus

        Teams

        Getting Hired

        Students

        Open Roles

     * (BUTTON) Log In

        Log In

        AppNexus Console

        Open AdStream (Europe)

        Open AdStream (North America-17)

        Open AdStream (North America-18)

   [en]
   (BUTTON) ×
   Search _______________
   Search

Main navigation

     * (BUTTON) Products

        Products

                Powerful enterprise technology for buyers and sellers

        Buy

                Programmatically buy media that delivers better outcomes

              AppNexus Programmable Platform

                      Deliver better outcomes through our customizable DSP

        Sell

                Get the most from every impression

              AppNexus Adserver

                      Serve your ads efficiently and transparently

              AppNexus SSP

                      Manage your programmatic demand in all formats and
                      channels

              Yieldex Analytics

                      Get a complete picture of your data and inventory

              Audience Extension

                      Understand your audience better than anyone else

     * (BUTTON) Marketplace

        Marketplace

                World’s leading destination for quality, efficient and
                brand-safe digital advertising

        Buy

                Buy in the largest independent marketplace

        Sell

                Sell in the largest independent marketplace

     * (BUTTON) Insights

        Insights

                Check out our white papers, case studies, and data-driven
                ad tech insights

        Blog Hub

                Our corporate, product, and tech blogs

        Customer Success

                Case studies on customer success

        Whitepapers

                Reports on digital advertising trends and best practices

   Contact
   Search _______________
   Search
   Cancel

Main navigation

     * Products
          + Buy

              AppNexus Programmable Platform

          + Sell

              AppNexus Adserver
              AppNexus SSP
              Yieldex Analytics
              Audience Extension

     * Marketplace
          + Buy
          + Sell
     * Insights
          + Blog Hub
          + Customer Success
          + Whitepapers

Quick Links

     * Careers
          + Life at AppNexus
          + Teams
          + Getting Hired
          + Students
          + Open Roles
     * Log In
          + AppNexus Console
          + Open AdStream (Europe)
          + Open AdStream (North America-17)
          + Open AdStream (North America-18)

   Change Region
   [en]
   Search
   Contact

   [seg?add=3359827&amp;t=2]

AppNexus Powers The Advertising That Powers The Internet

   Our mission is to create a better internet, and for us, that begins
   with advertising. Our open, transparent marketplace and powerful
   enterprise technology enable marketers to connect and engage consumers
   on thousands of high-quality websites and apps. The ads they buy fund
   award-winning journalism, music, video, and games-all at little or no
   cost to the consumers who enjoy open access to this premium content.
   Learn More

A premier marketplace for digital advertising

   [quality-icon-mobile.png]

Quality

   Roughly 90% of addressable comScore 200 digital publishers and all Ad
   Age 100 brands regularly sell and buy advertising in the AppNexus
   Marketplace.
   [safety-icon-mobile.png]

Safety

   We enforce strong prohibitions against domains and apps that traffic in
   hate speech, graphic violence, pornography, and fake news, and we’ve
   invested heavily in industry-leading anti-fraud technology.
   [cost-icon-mobile.png]

Cost Effectiveness

   The AppNexus Marketplace offers the industry’s most competitive pricing
   and provides a direct path between buyers and sellers, maximizing
   purchasing power for advertisers and monetization for publishers.
   [transparency-icon-mobile.png]

Transparency

   AppNexus brings transparency to the media supply chain so buyers and
   sellers understand exactly which impressions were bought and what
   technology fees were charged.

Enterprise Products for Buyers and Sellers of Digital Advertising

For Buyers

   Deliver better outcomes through our customizable DSP
   Get Started Buying

For Sellers

   Find a complete, transparent solution to manage your inventory
   Get Started Selling
   Created with Sketch.

Customer Success

   Ninety percent of comScore top 200 digital publishers and all AdAge top
   100 brands leverage AppNexus’ Marketplace.

   Join them.
   Scibids
   Read Case Study
   [slides-placeholder.png]
   Light Reaction
   Read Case Study
   [slides-placeholder.png]
   Greenhouse
   Read Case Study
   [slides-placeholder.png]
   Read all Case Studies

Find Your Perfect Solution

   Redirecting
   I am [_____________________]
   and I am looking for []
   Find Solutions

Footer

   Appnexus Logo

   28 W. 23rd Street
   New York, New York, 10010

Buy

   AppNexus Programmable Platform (DSP)

Sell

   AppNexus Adserver AppNexus SSP Audience Extension Yieldex Analytics

Marketplace

   Buy Sell

Insights

   Blog Hub Customer Success Thought Leadership Documentation Center

Company

   About Diversity and Inclusion Social Impact Leadership Press Locations
   Events
   See More

Careers

   Life at AppNexus Teams Getting Hired Tech Hub Students Open Roles
     * Copyright © 2019 AppNexus, A Xandr Company. All Rights Reserved.
     * Terms of Use
     * Trademarks Worldwide
     * Corporate Privacy Policy
     * Consumer Privacy
     * Candidate Privacy Policy
     * Opt Out
     * Copyright © 2019 AppNexus, A Xandr Company. All Rights Reserved.

     *
     *
     *
     *

   BACK TO TOP

   AppNexus and our partners use technology such as cookies on our site to
   personalize content, provide social media features, and analyze our
   traffic. Click below to consent to the use of this technology by
   AppNexus and these 3rd parties across the web. You can change your mind
   and revisit your consent choices at any time by returning to this site.
   GOT IT! Learn more
   #alternate

   Skip to main content

   (BUTTON)

Quick Links

     * (BUTTON) Careers

        Careers

        Life at AppNexus

        Teams

        Getting Hired

        Students

        Open Roles

     * (BUTTON) Log In

        Log In

        AppNexus Console

        Open AdStream (Europe)

        Open AdStream (North America-17)

        Open AdStream (North America-18)

   [en]
   (BUTTON) ×
   Search _______________
   Search

Main navigation

     * (BUTTON) Products

        Products

                Powerful enterprise technology for buyers and sellers

        Buy

                Programmatically buy media that delivers better outcomes

              AppNexus Programmable Platform

                      Deliver better outcomes through our customizable DSP

        Sell

                Get the most from every impression

              AppNexus Adserver

                      Serve your ads efficiently and transparently

              AppNexus SSP

                      Manage your programmatic demand in all formats and
                      channels

              Yieldex Analytics

                      Get a complete picture of your data and inventory

              Audience Extension

                      Understand your audience better than anyone else

     * (BUTTON) Marketplace

        Marketplace

                World’s leading destination for quality, efficient and
                brand-safe digital advertising

        Buy

                Buy in the largest independent marketplace

        Sell

                Sell in the largest independent marketplace

     * (BUTTON) Insights

        Insights

                Check out our white papers, case studies, and data-driven
                ad tech insights

        Blog Hub

                Our corporate, product, and tech blogs

        Customer Success

                Case studies on customer success

        Whitepapers

                Reports on digital advertising trends and best practices

   Contact
   Search _______________
   Search
   Cancel

Main navigation

     * Products
          + Buy

              AppNexus Programmable Platform

          + Sell

              AppNexus Adserver
              AppNexus SSP
              Yieldex Analytics
              Audience Extension

     * Marketplace
          + Buy
          + Sell
     * Insights
          + Blog Hub
          + Customer Success
          + Whitepapers

Quick Links

     * Careers
          + Life at AppNexus
          + Teams
          + Getting Hired
          + Students
          + Open Roles
     * Log In
          + AppNexus Console
          + Open AdStream (Europe)
          + Open AdStream (North America-17)
          + Open AdStream (North America-18)

   Change Region
   [en]
   Search
   Contact

   [seg?add=3359827&amp;t=2]

AppNexus Powers The Advertising That Powers The Internet

   Our mission is to create a better internet, and for us, that begins
   with advertising. Our open, transparent marketplace and powerful
   enterprise technology enable marketers to connect and engage consumers
   on thousands of high-quality websites and apps. The ads they buy fund
   award-winning journalism, music, video, and games-all at little or no
   cost to the consumers who enjoy open access to this premium content.
   Learn More

A premier marketplace for digital advertising

   [quality-icon-mobile.png]

Quality

   Roughly 90% of addressable comScore 200 digital publishers and all Ad
   Age 100 brands regularly sell and buy advertising in the AppNexus
   Marketplace.
   [safety-icon-mobile.png]

Safety

   We enforce strong prohibitions against domains and apps that traffic in
   hate speech, graphic violence, pornography, and fake news, and we’ve
   invested heavily in industry-leading anti-fraud technology.
   [cost-icon-mobile.png]

Cost Effectiveness

   The AppNexus Marketplace offers the industry’s most competitive pricing
   and provides a direct path between buyers and sellers, maximizing
   purchasing power for advertisers and monetization for publishers.
   [transparency-icon-mobile.png]

Transparency

   AppNexus brings transparency to the media supply chain so buyers and
   sellers understand exactly which impressions were bought and what
   technology fees were charged.

Enterprise Products for Buyers and Sellers of Digital Advertising

For Buyers

   Deliver better outcomes through our customizable DSP
   Get Started Buying

For Sellers

   Find a complete, transparent solution to manage your inventory
   Get Started Selling
   Created with Sketch.

Customer Success

   Ninety percent of comScore top 200 digital publishers and all AdAge top
   100 brands leverage AppNexus’ Marketplace.

   Join them.
   Scibids
   Read Case Study
   [slides-placeholder.png]
   Light Reaction
   Read Case Study
   [slides-placeholder.png]
   Greenhouse
   Read Case Study
   [slides-placeholder.png]
   Read all Case Studies

Find Your Perfect Solution

   Redirecting
   I am [_____________________]
   and I am looking for []
   Find Solutions

Footer

   Appnexus Logo

   28 W. 23rd Street
   New York, New York, 10010

Buy

   AppNexus Programmable Platform (DSP)

Sell

   AppNexus Adserver AppNexus SSP Audience Extension Yieldex Analytics

Marketplace

   Buy Sell

Insights

   Blog Hub Customer Success Thought Leadership Documentation Center

Company

   About Diversity and Inclusion Social Impact Leadership Press Locations
   Events
   See More

Careers

   Life at AppNexus Teams Getting Hired Tech Hub Students Open Roles
     * Copyright © 2019 AppNexus, A Xandr Company. All Rights Reserved.
     * Terms of Use
     * Trademarks Worldwide
     * Corporate Privacy Policy
     * Consumer Privacy
     * Candidate Privacy Policy
     * Opt Out
     * Copyright © 2019 AppNexus, A Xandr Company. All Rights Reserved.

     *
     *
     *
     *

   BACK TO TOP

   AppNexus and our partners use technology such as cookies on our site to
   personalize content, provide social media features, and analyze our
   traffic. Click below to consent to the use of this technology by
   AppNexus and these 3rd parties across the web. You can change your mind
   and revisit your consent choices at any time by returning to this site.
   GOT IT! Learn more
   #alternate

   Skip to main content

   (BUTTON)

Quick Links

     * (BUTTON) Careers

        Careers

        Life at AppNexus

        Teams

        Getting Hired

        Students

        Open Roles

     * (BUTTON) Log In

        Log In

        AppNexus Console

        Open AdStream (Europe)

        Open AdStream (North America-17)

        Open AdStream (North America-18)

   [en]
   (BUTTON) ×
   Search _______________
   Search

Main navigation

     * (BUTTON) Products

        Products

                Powerful enterprise technology for buyers and sellers

        Buy

                Programmatically buy media that delivers better outcomes

              AppNexus Programmable Platform

                      Deliver better outcomes through our customizable DSP

        Sell

                Get the most from every impression

              AppNexus Adserver

                      Serve your ads efficiently and transparently

              AppNexus SSP

                      Manage your programmatic demand in all formats and
                      channels

              Yieldex Analytics

                      Get a complete picture of your data and inventory

              Audience Extension

                      Understand your audience better than anyone else

     * (BUTTON) Marketplace

        Marketplace

                World’s leading destination for quality, efficient and
                brand-safe digital advertising

        Buy

                Buy in the largest independent marketplace

        Sell

                Sell in the largest independent marketplace

     * (BUTTON) Insights

        Insights

                Check out our white papers, case studies, and data-driven
                ad tech insights

        Blog Hub

                Our corporate, product, and tech blogs

        Customer Success

                Case studies on customer success

        Whitepapers

                Reports on digital advertising trends and best practices

   Contact
   Search _______________
   Search
   Cancel

Main navigation

     * Products
          + Buy

              AppNexus Programmable Platform

          + Sell

              AppNexus Adserver
              AppNexus SSP
              Yieldex Analytics
              Audience Extension

     * Marketplace
          + Buy
          + Sell
     * Insights
          + Blog Hub
          + Customer Success
          + Whitepapers

Quick Links

     * Careers
          + Life at AppNexus
          + Teams
          + Getting Hired
          + Students
          + Open Roles
     * Log In
          + AppNexus Console
          + Open AdStream (Europe)
          + Open AdStream (North America-17)
          + Open AdStream (North America-18)

   Change Region
   [en]
   Search
   Contact

   [seg?add=3359827&amp;t=2]

AppNexus Powers The Advertising That Powers The Internet

   Our mission is to create a better internet, and for us, that begins
   with advertising. Our open, transparent marketplace and powerful
   enterprise technology enable marketers to connect and engage consumers
   on thousands of high-quality websites and apps. The ads they buy fund
   award-winning journalism, music, video, and games-all at little or no
   cost to the consumers who enjoy open access to this premium content.
   Learn More

A premier marketplace for digital advertising

   [quality-icon-mobile.png]

Quality

   Roughly 90% of addressable comScore 200 digital publishers and all Ad
   Age 100 brands regularly sell and buy advertising in the AppNexus
   Marketplace.
   [safety-icon-mobile.png]

Safety

   We enforce strong prohibitions against domains and apps that traffic in
   hate speech, graphic violence, pornography, and fake news, and we’ve
   invested heavily in industry-leading anti-fraud technology.
   [cost-icon-mobile.png]

Cost Effectiveness

   The AppNexus Marketplace offers the industry’s most competitive pricing
   and provides a direct path between buyers and sellers, maximizing
   purchasing power for advertisers and monetization for publishers.
   [transparency-icon-mobile.png]

Transparency

   AppNexus brings transparency to the media supply chain so buyers and
   sellers understand exactly which impressions were bought and what
   technology fees were charged.

Enterprise Products for Buyers and Sellers of Digital Advertising

For Buyers

   Deliver better outcomes through our customizable DSP
   Get Started Buying

For Sellers

   Find a complete, transparent solution to manage your inventory
   Get Started Selling
   Created with Sketch.

Customer Success

   Ninety percent of comScore top 200 digital publishers and all AdAge top
   100 brands leverage AppNexus’ Marketplace.

   Join them.
   Scibids
   Read Case Study
   [slides-placeholder.png]
   Light Reaction
   Read Case Study
   [slides-placeholder.png]
   Greenhouse
   Read Case Study
   [slides-placeholder.png]
   Read all Case Studies

Find Your Perfect Solution

   Redirecting
   I am [_____________________]
   and I am looking for []
   Find Solutions

Footer

   Appnexus Logo

   28 W. 23rd Street
   New York, New York, 10010

Buy

   AppNexus Programmable Platform (DSP)

Sell

   AppNexus Adserver AppNexus SSP Audience Extension Yieldex Analytics

Marketplace

   Buy Sell

Insights

   Blog Hub Customer Success Thought Leadership Documentation Center

Company

   About Diversity and Inclusion Social Impact Leadership Press Locations
   Events
   See More

Careers

   Life at AppNexus Teams Getting Hired Tech Hub Students Open Roles
     * Copyright © 2019 AppNexus, A Xandr Company. All Rights Reserved.
     * Terms of Use
     * Trademarks Worldwide
     * Corporate Privacy Policy
     * Consumer Privacy
     * Candidate Privacy Policy
     * Opt Out
     * Copyright © 2019 AppNexus, A Xandr Company. All Rights Reserved.

     *
     *
     *
     *

   BACK TO TOP

   AppNexus and our partners use technology such as cookies on our site to
   personalize content, provide social media features, and analyze our
   traffic. Click below to consent to the use of this technology by
   AppNexus and these 3rd parties across the web. You can change your mind
   and revisit your consent choices at any time by returning to this site.
   GOT IT! Learn more
